Florida, session 2026, SB1598.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 468 469 Section 1.âEffective upon becoming a law, subsection (1) of 470 section 20.10, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 471 20.10âDepartment of State.âThere is created a Department of 472 State. 473 (1)âThe head of the Department of State is the Secretary of 474 State. The Secretary of State shall be elected at the statewide 475 general election at which the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, and 476 Cabinet officers are elected, as provided in s. 5, Art. IV of 477 the State Constitution, and shall serve a term of 4 years 478 beginning on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in January 479 of the year following such election appointed by the Governor, 480 subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall serve at the 481 pleasure of the Governor. The Secretary of State shall perform 482 the functions conferred by the State Constitution upon the 483 custodian of state records. 484 Section 2.âSubsection (4) is added to section 20.32, 485 Florida Statutes, to read: 486 20.32âFlorida Commission on Offender Review.â 487 (4)(a)âFor the purpose of assisting a person who has been 488 disqualified from voting based on a felony conviction, other 489 than a conviction for murder or a felony sexual offense, in 490 determining whether he or she has met the requirements under s. 491 98.0751 to have his or her voting rights restored pursuant to s. 492 4, Art. VI of the State Constitution, the commission shall 493 develop and maintain a database that contains for each such 494 person all of the following information: 495 1.âHis or her name and any other personal identifying 496 information. 497 2.âThe remaining length of any term of supervision, 498 including, but not limited to, probation, community control, or 499 parole, ordered by a court as part of his or her sentence. 500 3.âThe remaining amount of any restitution he or she owes 501 to a victim as ordered by a court as part of his or her 502 sentence. 503 4.âThe remaining amount due of all fines or fees that were 504 initially ordered by a court as part of his or her sentence or 505 as a condition of any form of supervision, including, but not 506 limited to, probation, community control, or parole. 507 5.âThe completion status of any other term ordered by a 508 court as a part of his or her sentence. 509 6.âAny other information needed to determine whether he or 510 she has met the requirements for restoration of voting rights 511 under s. 98.0751. 512 (b)âThe Department of State, the Department of Corrections, 513 the clerks of the circuit court, the county comptrollers, and 514 the Board of Executive Clemency shall provide to the commission 515 on a monthly basis any information required under paragraph (a). 516 (c)âThe Department of Management Services, acting through 517 the Florida Digital Service, shall provide any technical 518 assistance necessary for the commission to develop and maintain 519 the database. The Department of Management Services may adopt 520 rules governing the provision of such assistance. 521 (d)âBy July 1, 2028, the commission shall make the database 522 available on a public website. The commission shall update the 523 database monthly with the information received from each 524 governmental entity under paragraph (b). The commission shall 525 publish on the website clear instructions that a person who has 526 been disqualified from voting based on a felony conviction, 527 other than for murder or a felony sexual offense, may follow to 528 have his or her voting rights restored and to register to vote. 529 (e)âBy July 1, 2027, the commission shall provide a 530 comprehensive plan to the Governor, the President of the Senate, 531 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives which includes 532 all of the following: 533 1.âThe governmental entities from which and the methods by 534 which the commission shall collect, centralize, analyze, and 535 secure the information required to be included in the database. 536 2.âA description of any infrastructure and services, 537 including, but not limited to, software, hardware, and 538 information technology services, which may be necessary to 539 create and maintain the database. 540 3.âThe anticipated number of additional employees necessary 541 for: 542 a.âThe commission to develop and maintain the database. 543 b.âA governmental entity to provide the information 544 required under paragraph (b). 545 c.âThe Florida Digital Service to provide the assistance 546 required under paragraph (c). 547 4.âThe anticipated initial cost to develop the database; 548 the annual cost to maintain the database; and the annual 549 appropriation required to fund the anticipated costs incurred by 550 the commission, each governmental entity, and the Florida 551 Digital Service. 552 5.âAny legal authority necessary for the commission to 553 develop and maintain the database. 554 6.âDraft legislation to implement the comprehensive plan. 555 (f)âNotwithstanding any other law, a person who registers 556 to vote or who votes in reasonable reliance on information 557 contained in the database indicating that his or her voting 558 rights have been restored pursuant to s. 4, Art. VI of the State 559 Constitution has an affirmative right to register and to vote 560 and may not be charged with a violation of any criminal law of 561 this state related to fraudulently voting or registering to 562 vote. 563 (g)âIf an individual was registered to vote before his or 564 her felony conviction met the requirements under s. 98.0751 to 565 have his or her voting rights restored pursuant to s. 4, Art. VI 566 of the State Constitution, the Division of Elections and the 567 individualâs supervisor of elections shall, as soon as 568 practicable, complete the necessary steps to automatically 569 reregister such individual to vote at his or her most recent 570 address. This process must be noted in the statewide database. 571 (h)âIf an individual meets the requirements under s. 572 98.0751 to have his or her voting rights restored pursuant to s. 573 4, Art. VI of the State Constitution, but was not registered to 574 vote before his or her conviction, the Division of Elections and 575 the individualâs supervisor of elections shall send by United 576 States mail to the individualâs most current address information 577 on how to register to vote, including a copy of the current 578 voter registration form. This process must be noted in the 579 statewide database. 580 (i)âWithin 120 days before a general election until the 581 voter registration deadline for that election, information on 582 the statewide database must be updated weekly rather than 583 monthly. 584 (j)âThe commission shall adopt rules to implement this 585 subsection. 586 Section 3.âSection 97.021, Florida Statutes, is amended to 587 read: 588 97.021âDefinitions.âFor the purposes of this code, except 589 where the context clearly indicates otherwise, the term: 590 (1)ââAbsent electorâ means any registered and qualified 591 voter who casts a vote-by-mail ballot. 592 (2)ââAbsent uniformed services voterâ means: 593 (a)âA member of a uniformed service on active duty who, by 594 reason of such active duty, is absent from the place of 595 residence where the member is otherwise qualified to vote; 596 (b)âA member of the merchant marine who, by reason of 597 service in the merchant marine, is absent from the place of 598 residence where the member is otherwise qualified to vote; or 599 (c)âA spouse or dependent of a member referred to in 600 paragraph (a) or paragraph (b) who, by reason of the active duty 601 or service of the member, is absent from the place of residence 602 where the spouse or dependent is otherwise qualified to vote. 603 (3)ââAddress of legal residenceâ means the legal 604 residential address of the elector and includes all information 605 necessary to differentiate one residence from another, 606 including, but not limited to, a distinguishing apartment, 607 suite, lot, room, or dormitory room number or other identifier. 608 (4)ââAlternative formatsâ has the meaning ascribed in the 609 Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, Pub. L. No. 101-336, 42 610 U.S.C. ss. 12101 et seq., including specifically the technical 611 assistance manuals promulgated thereunder, as amended. 612 (5)ââAutomatic tabulating equipmentâ means an apparatus 613 that automatically examines, counts, and records votes. 614 (6)ââBallotâ or âofficial ballotâ when used in reference 615 to: 616 (a)ââElectronic or electromechanical devicesâ means a 617 ballot that is voted by the process of electronically 618 designating, including by touchscreen, or marking with a marking 619 device for tabulation by automatic tabulating equipment or data 620 processing equipment. 621 (b)ââMarksense ballotsâ means that printed sheet of paper, 622 used in conjunction with an electronic or electromechanical vote 623 tabulation voting system, containing the names of candidates, or 624 a statement of proposed constitutional amendments or other 625 questions or propositions submitted to the electorate at any 626 election, on which sheet of paper an elector casts his or her 627 vote. 628 (7)ââCandidateâ means any person to whom any one or more of 629 the following applies: 630 (a)âAny person who seeks to qualify for nomination or 631 election by means of the petitioning process. 632 (b)âAny person who seeks to qualify for election as a 633 write-in candidate. 634 (c)âAny person who receives contributions or makes 635 expenditures, or gives his or her consent for any other person 636 to receive contributions or make expenditures, with a view to 637 bringing about his or her nomination or election to, or 638 retention in, public office. 639 (d)âAny person who appoints a treasurer and designates a 640 primary depository. 641 (e)âAny person who files qualification papers and 642 subscribes to a candidateâs oath as required by law. 643 644 However, this definition does not include any candidate for a 645 political party executive committee. 646 (8)ââDatabase and instituteâ means the Florida Voting and 647 Elections Database and Institute. 648 (9)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of State. 649 (10)(9)ââDivisionâ means the Division of Elections of the 650 Department of State. 651 (11)(10)ââEarly votingâ means casting a ballot prior to 652 election day at a location designated by the supervisor of 653 elections and depositing the voted ballot in the tabulation 654 system. 655 (12)(11)ââEarly voting areaâ means the area designated by 656 the supervisor of elections at an early voting site at which 657 early voting activities occur, including, but not limited to, 658 lines of voters waiting to be processed, the area where voters 659 check in and are processed, and the area where voters cast their 660 ballots. 661 (13)(12)ââEarly voting siteâ means those locations 662 specified in s. 101.657 and the building in which early voting 663 occurs. 664 (14)(13)ââElectionâ means any primary election, special 665 primary election, special election, general election, county 666 election, municipal election, referendum, or presidential 667 preference primary election, or any other local or state 668 election. 669 (15)(14)ââElection boardâ means the clerk and inspectors 670 appointed to conduct an election. 671 (16)(15)ââElection costsâ shall include, but not be limited 672 to, expenditures for all paper supplies such as envelopes, 673 instructions to voters, affidavits, reports, ballot cards, 674 ballot booklets for vote-by-mail voters, postage, notices to 675 voters; advertisements for registration book closings, testing 676 of voting equipment, sample ballots, and polling places; forms 677 used to qualify candidates; polling site rental and equipment 678 delivery and pickup; data processing time and supplies; election 679 records retention; and labor costs, including those costs 680 uniquely associated with vote-by-mail ballot preparation, poll 681 workers, and election night canvass. 682 (17)ââElection policy or practiceâ includes any 683 qualification to be an elector, prerequisite to voting, or 684 method of election, as well as any law, statute, ordinance, 685 resolution, charter code or provision, regulation, rule, policy, 686 practice, procedure, standard, or action with respect to voting 687 or the administration or schedule of elections. 688 (18)(16)ââElectorâ is synonymous with the word âvoterâ or 689 âqualified elector or voter,â except where the word is used to 690 describe presidential electors. 691 (19)ââFederal Voting Rights Actâ means the federal Voting 692 Rights Act of 1965, 52 U.S.C. s. 10301 et seq., as amended. 693 (20)ââFLVRA Commissionâ means the Florida Voting Rights Act 694 Commission. 695 (21)(17)ââGeneral electionâ means an election held on the 696 first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in the even 697 numbered years, for the purpose of filling national, state, 698 county, and district offices and for voting on constitutional 699 amendments not otherwise provided for by law. 700 (22)ââGovernment enforcement actionâ means any denial of 701 administrative or judicial preclearance by the state or the 702 Federal Government; pending litigation filed by a state or 703 federal entity; or final judgment or adjudication, consent 704 decree, or other similar formal action. 705 (23)ââLegislative bodyâ means the commission, council, 706 school board, or other similar body, by whatever name known, of 707 local government. 708 (24)(18)ââLists of registered electorsâ means names and 709 associated information of registered electors maintained by the 710 department in the statewide voter registration system or 711 generated or derived from the statewide voter registration 712 system. Lists may be produced in printed or electronic format. 713 (25)ââLocal governmentâ means any county, municipality, 714 school district, special district, supervisor of elections or 715 other governmental entity that administers elections, or any 716 other political subdivision in this state in which elections are 717 conducted. 718 (26)(19)ââMember of the Merchant Marineâ means an 719 individual, other than a member of a uniformed service or an 720 individual employed, enrolled, or maintained on the Great Lakes 721 for the inland waterways, who is: 722 (a)âEmployed as an officer or crew member of a vessel 723 documented under the laws of the United States, a vessel owned 724 by the United States, or a vessel of foreign-flag registry under 725 charter to or control of the United States; or 726 (b)âEnrolled with the United States for employment or 727 training for employment, or maintained by the United States for 728 emergency relief service, as an officer or crew member of such 729 vessel. 730 (27)ââMethod of electionâ means the method by which 731 candidates are elected to a governmental body of a local 732 government and includes any at-large, district-based, share 733 based, or other method of election, as well as any districting 734 or redistricting plan used to elect candidates to the 735 governmental body. Methods of election include: 736 (a)ââAt-large method of electionâ means a method of 737 election in which candidates are voted on by all voters in the 738 local governmentâs jurisdiction, voters are allowed or required 739 to cast as many votes as there are seats to fill, and voters may 740 not cast more than one vote for a given candidate. 741 (b)ââDistrict-based method of electionâ means a method of 742 election in which the local government is divided into 743 districts, each district is represented by a single 744 representative, and a candidate is voted on only by voters 745 residing in his or her district. 746 (c)ââOther method of electionâ means a method of election 747 other than an at-large, district-based, or share-based method of 748 election, or any combination of methods of election. 749 (d)ââShare-based method of electionâ means a method of 750 election in which more than one candidate is to be elected and 751 different groups of voters may each elect their preferred 752 candidates to the seats to fill based on their relative share of 753 the votes cast. Share-based methods of election include, but are 754 not limited to, the single transferable vote, cumulative voting, 755 limited voting, and party-list or state-list systems. 756 (28)(20)ââMinor political partyâ is any group as specified 757 in s. 103.095 which on January 1 preceding a primary election 758 does not have registered as members 5 percent of the total 759 registered electors of the state. 760 (29)(21)ââNewspaper of general circulationâ means a 761 newspaper printed in the language most commonly spoken in the 762 area within which it circulates and which is readily available 763 for purchase by all inhabitants in the area of circulation, but 764 does not include a newspaper intended primarily for members of a 765 particular professional or occupational group, a newspaper the 766 primary function of which is to carry legal notices, or a 767 newspaper that is given away primarily to distribute 768 advertising. 769 (30)(22)ââNominal valueâ means having a retail value of $10 770 or less. 771 (31)(23)ââNonpartisan officeâ means an office for which a 772 candidate is prohibited from campaigning or qualifying for 773 election or retention in office based on party affiliation. 774 (32)(24)ââOffice that serves persons with disabilitiesâ 775 means any state office that takes applications either in person 776 or over the telephone from persons with disabilities for any 777 program, service, or benefit primarily related to their 778 disabilities. 779 (33)ââOrganizationâ means a person other than an 780 individual. 781 (34)(25)ââOverseas voterâ means: 782 (a)âAn absent uniformed services voter who, by reason of 783 active duty or service, is absent from the United States on the 784 date of the election involved; 785 (b)âA person who resides outside the United States and is 786 qualified to vote in the last place in which the person was 787 domiciled before leaving the United States; or 788 (c)âA person who resides outside the United States and, but 789 for such residence, would be qualified to vote in the last place 790 in which the person was domiciled before leaving the United 791 States. 792 (35)(26)ââOvervoteâ means that the elector marks or 793 designates more names than there are persons to be elected to an 794 office or designates more than one answer to a ballot question, 795 and the tabulator records no vote for the office or question. 796 (36)(27)ââPersons with disabilitiesâ means individuals who 797 have a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits 798 one or more major life activities. 799 (37)(28)ââPetition circulatorâ means an entity or 800 individual who collects signatures for the purpose of qualifying 801 a proposed constitutional amendment for ballot placement. The 802 term does not include a person who collects, delivers, or 803 otherwise physically possesses no more than 25 signed petition 804 forms in addition to his or her own signed petition form or a 805 signed petition form belonging to the personâs spouse, or the 806 parent, child, grandparent, grandchild, or sibling of the person 807 or the personâs spouse. 808 (38)(29)ââPolling placeâ is the building which contains the 809 polling room where ballots are cast. 810 (39)(30)ââPolling roomâ means the actual room in which 811 ballots are cast on election day and during early voting. 812 (40)(31)ââPrimary electionâ means an election held 813 preceding the general election for the purpose of nominating a 814 party nominee to be voted for in the general election to fill a 815 national, state, county, or district office. 816 (41)ââProtected classâ means a class of citizens who are 817 members of a race, color, or language minority group, as defined 818 in this subsection or under the federal Voting Rights Act, as 819 amended, provided that any subsequent amendment applies only to 820 the extent that it affords greater protection. 821 (a)âFor the purposes of this subsection, the term âlanguage 822 minority groupâ means a group based on the best available data 823 that may include information from the United States Census 824 Bureau American Community Survey or data of comparable quality 825 collected by a governmental entity: 826 1.âOf more than 2 percent, but no fewer than 200 citizens 827 of voting age in a jurisdiction who speak a language other than 828 English and are limited English proficient individuals; or 829 2.âOf more than 4,000 citizens of voting age in a 830 jurisdiction who speak a language other than English and are 831 limited English proficient individuals. 832 (b)âAn eligible citizen may not be denied or abridged the 833 right to vote. Any election standard, practice, or procedure may 834 not be applied in a manner that discriminates against, or has 835 the effect of diminishing the ability of, any member of a 836 protected class to participate equally in the political process. 837 (42)(32)ââProvisional ballotâ means a conditional ballot, 838 the validity of which is determined by the canvassing board. 839 (43)(33)ââPublic assistanceâ means assistance provided 840 through the food assistance program under the federal 841 Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program; the Medicaid program; 842 the Special Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infants, and 843 Children; and the Temporary Cash Assistance Program. 844 (44)(34)ââPublic officeâ means any federal, state, county, 845 municipal, school, or other district office or position which is 846 filled by vote of the electors. 847 (45)(35)ââQualifying educational institutionâ means any 848 public or private educational institution receiving state 849 financial assistance which has, as its primary mission, the 850 provision of education or training to students who are at least 851 18 years of age, provided such institution has more than 200 852 students enrolled in classes with the institution and provided 853 that the recognized student government organization has 854 requested this designation in writing and has filed the request 855 with the office of the supervisor of elections in the county in 856 which the institution is located. 857 (46)ââRacially polarized votingâ means voting in which the 858 candidate or electoral choice preferred by protected class 859 members diverges from the candidate or electoral choice 860 preferred by voters who are not protected class members. 861 (47)(36)ââSpecial electionâ is a special election called 862 for the purpose of voting on a party nominee to fill a vacancy 863 in the national, state, county, or district office. 864 (48)(37)ââSpecial primary electionâ is a special nomination 865 election designated by the Governor, called for the purpose of 866 nominating a party nominee to be voted on in a general or 867 special election. 868 (49)(38)ââSupervisorâ means the supervisor of elections. 869 (50)(39)ââTactile input deviceâ means a device that 870 provides information to a voting system by means of a voter 871 touching the device, such as a keyboard, and that complies with 872 the requirements of s. 101.56062(1)(k) and (l). 873 (51)(40)ââThird-party registration organizationâ means any 874 person, entity, or organization soliciting or collecting voter 875 registration applications. A third-party voter registration 876 organization does not include: 877 (a)âA person who seeks only to register to vote or collect 878 voter registration applications from that personâs spouse, 879 child, or parent; or 880 (b)âA person engaged in registering to vote or collecting 881 voter registration applications as an employee or agent of the 882 division, supervisor of elections, Department of Highway Safety 883 and Motor Vehicles, or a voter registration agency. 884 (52)(41)ââUndervoteâ means that the elector does not 885 properly designate any choice for an office or ballot question, 886 and the tabulator records no vote for the office or question. 887 (53)(42)ââUniformed servicesâ means the Army, Navy, Air 888 Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, and Coast Guard, the 889 commissioned corps of the Public Health Service, and the 890 commissioned corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric 891 Administration. 892 (54)ââVoteâ or âvotingâ includes any action necessary to 893 cast a ballot and make such ballot effective in any election or 894 primary election, which actions include, but are not limited to, 895 registering to vote, requesting a vote-by-mail ballot, and any 896 other action required by law as a prerequisite to casting a 897 ballot and having such ballot counted, canvassed, or certified 898 properly and included in the appropriate totals of votes cast 899 with respect to candidates for election or nomination and to 900 referendum questions. 901 (55)(43)ââVoter interface deviceâ means any device that 902 communicates voting instructions and ballot information to a 903 voter and allows the voter to select and vote for candidates and 904 issues. A voter interface device may not be used to tabulate 905 votes. Any vote tabulation must be based upon a subsequent scan 906 of the marked marksense ballot or the voter-verifiable paper 907 output after the voter interface device process has been 908 completed. 909 (56)(44)ââVoter registration agencyâ means any office that 910 provides public assistance, any office that serves persons with 911 disabilities, any center for independent living, or any public 912 library. 913 (57)(45)ââVoter registration officialâ means any supervisor 914 of elections or individual authorized by the Secretary of State 915 to accept voter registration applications and execute updates to 916 the statewide voter registration system. 917 (58)(46)ââVoting boothâ or âboothâ means that booth or 918 enclosure wherein an elector casts his or her ballot for 919 tabulation by an electronic or electromechanical device. 920 (59)(47)ââVoting systemâ means a method of casting and 921 processing votes that functions wholly or partly by use of 922 electromechanical or electronic apparatus or by use of marksense 923 ballots and includes, but is not limited to, the procedures for 924 casting and processing votes and the programs, operating 925 manuals, supplies, printouts, and other software necessary for 926 the systemâs operation. 927 928 Terms used in this code which are not defined in this section 929 but are used in the federal Voting Rights Act and interpreted in 930 relevant case law, including, but not limited to, âpolitical 931 processâ and âprerequisite to voting,â must be construed in a 932 manner consistent with such usage and interpretation. 933 Section 4.âSection 97.022, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 934 Section 5.âSection 97.0291, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 935 Section 6.âSection 97.0556, Florida Statutes, is created to 936 read: 937 97.0556âSame-day voter registration.âA person who meets the 938 qualifications specified in s. 97.041 to register to vote for 939 the early voting period, or at his or her polling place on 940 election day, and who provides the information required under s. 941 97.052 for the uniform statewide voter registration application, 942 may register at an early voting site or at his or her polling 943 place and immediately thereafter cast a ballot. 944 Section 7.âSection 97.057, Florida Statutes, is amended to 945 read: 946 97.057âVoter registration by the Department of Highway 947 Safety and Motor Vehicles.â 948 (1)(a)âEach of the following serves as an application The 949 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles shall provide 950 the opportunity to preregister to vote, register to vote, or to 951 update a voter registration record when submitted to the 952 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles to each 953 individual who comes to an office of that department to: 954 1.(a)âAn application for, or renewal of, Apply for or renew 955 a driver license; 956 2.(b)âAn application for, or renewal of, Apply for or renew 957 an identification card pursuant to chapter 322; or 958 3.(c)âAn application for a change of an address on an 959 existing driver license or identification card. 960 (b)âUnless the applicant declines to register or 961 preregister to vote, he or she is deemed to have consented to 962 the use of the signature from his or her driver license or 963 identification card application for voter registration purposes. 964 (2)âAn application for a driver license or an 965 identification card must include a voter registration component. 966 The voter registration component must be approved by the 967 Department of State and must include all of the following: 968 (a)âThe minimum amount of information necessary to prevent 969 duplicate voter registrations and to preserve the ability of the 970 department and supervisors of elections to assess the 971 eligibility of the applicant and administer voter registration 972 and other provisions of this code. 973 (b)âA statement setting forth voter eligibility 974 requirements. 975 (c)âAn explanation that the applicant is consenting to the 976 use of his or her signature from the applicantâs driver license 977 or identification card application for voter registration 978 purposes. By consenting to the use of his or her signature, the 979 applicant is deemed to have subscribed to the oaths required by 980 s. 3, Art. VI of the State Constitution and s. 97.051 and to 981 have sworn and affirmed that the voter registration information 982 contained in the application is true under penalty for false 983 swearing pursuant to s. 104.011. 984 (d)âAn option that allows the applicant to choose or update 985 a party affiliation. An applicant who is initially registering 986 to vote and does not exercise such option must be sent a notice 987 by the supervisor of elections in accordance with s. 988 97.053(5)(b). 989 (e)âAn option that allows the applicant to decline to 990 register to vote or preregister to vote. The Department of 991 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles shall note any such 992 declination in its records and forward the declination to the 993 Department of State. A declination may be used only for voter 994 registration purposes and is confidential and exempt from public 995 records requirements as provided in s. 97.0585. 996 (3)âThe Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 997 shall: 998 (a)âDevelop a voter registration component for applications 999 which meets the requirements set forth in subsection (2). 1000 (b)âElectronically transmit the voter registration 1001 component of an applicantâs driver license or identification 1002 card application to the Department of State within 24 hours 1003 after receipt. Upon receipt of the voter registration component, 1004 the Department of State shall provide the information to the 1005 supervisor of the county in which the applicant is registering 1006 or preregistering to vote or updating his or her voter 1007 registration record. 1008 (2)âThe Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 1009 shall: 1010 (a)âNotify each individual, orally or in writing, that: 1011 1.âInformation gathered for the completion of a driver 1012 license or identification card application, renewal, or change 1013 of address can be automatically transferred to a voter 1014 registration application; 1015 2.âIf additional information and a signature are provided, 1016 the voter registration application will be completed and sent to 1017 the proper election authority; 1018 3.âInformation provided can also be used to update a voter 1019 registration record, except that party affiliation will not be 1020 changed unless the individual designates a change in party 1021 affiliation and separately consents to such change in writing; 1022 4.âAll declinations will remain confidential and may be 1023 used only for voter registration purposes; and 1024 5.âThe particular driver license office in which the person 1025 applies to register to vote or updates a voter registration 1026 record will remain confidential and may be used only for voter 1027 registration purposes. 1028 (b)âRequire a driver license examiner to inquire orally or, 1029 if the applicant is hearing impaired, inquire in writing whether 1030 the applicant wishes to register to vote or update a voter 1031 registration record during the completion of a driver license or 1032 identification card application, renewal, or change of address. 1033 1.âIf the applicant chooses to register to vote or to 1034 update a voter registration record: 1035 a.âAll applicable information received by the Department of 1036 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles in the course of filling out 1037 the forms necessary under subsection (1) must be transferred to 1038 a voter registration application. 1039 b.âThe additional necessary information must be obtained by 1040 the driver license examiner and must not duplicate any 1041 information already obtained while completing the forms required 1042 under subsection (1). 1043 c.âA voter registration application with all of the 1044 applicantâs voter registration information required to establish 1045 the applicantâs eligibility pursuant to s. 97.041 must be 1046 presented to the applicant to review and verify the voter 1047 registration information received and provide an electronic 1048 signature affirming the accuracy of the information provided. 1049 d.âThe voter registration application may not be used to 1050 change the party affiliation of the applicant unless the 1051 applicant designates a change in party affiliation and provides 1052 a separate signature consenting to the party affiliation change. 1053 e.âAfter verifying the voter registration information and 1054 providing his or her electronic signature, the applicant must be 1055 provided with a printed receipt that includes such information 1056 and documents any change in party affiliation. 1057 2.âIf the applicant declines to register to vote, update 1058 the applicantâs voter registration record, or change the 1059 applicantâs address by either orally declining or by failing to 1060 sign the voter registration application, the Department of 1061 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles must note such declination on 1062 its records and shall forward the declination to the statewide 1063 voter registration system. 1064 (3)âFor the purpose of this section, the Department of 1065 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, with the approval of the 1066 Department of State, shall prescribe: 1067 (a)âA voter registration application that is the same in 1068 content, format, and size as the uniform statewide voter 1069 registration application prescribed under s. 97.052; and 1070 (b)âA form that will inform applicants under subsection (1) 1071 of the information contained in paragraph (2)(a). 1072 (4)âThe Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 1073 must electronically transmit completed voter registration 1074 applications within 24 hours after receipt to the statewide 1075 voter registration system. Completed paper voter registration 1076 applications received by the Department of Highway Safety and 1077 Motor Vehicles shall be forwarded within 5 days after receipt to 1078 the supervisor of the county where the office that processed or 1079 received that application is located. 1080 (5)âThe Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 1081 must send, with each driver license renewal extension 1082 application authorized pursuant to s. 322.18(8), a uniform 1083 statewide voter registration application, the voter registration 1084 application prescribed under paragraph (3)(a), or a voter 1085 registration application developed especially for the purposes 1086 of this subsection by the Department of Highway Safety and Motor 1087 Vehicles, with the approval of the Department of State, which 1088 must meet the requirements of s. 97.052. 1089 (4)(6)âA person providing voter registration services for a 1090 driver license office may not: 1091 (a)âMake any change to an applicantâs party affiliation 1092 unless the applicant provides a separate signature consenting to 1093 the party affiliation change or discuss or Seek to influence an 1094 applicantâs political preference or party registration; 1095 (b)âDisplay any political preference or party allegiance; 1096 (c)âMake any statement to an applicant or take any action 1097 the purpose or effect of which is to discourage the applicant 1098 from registering to vote; or 1099 (d)âDisclose any applicantâs voter registration information 1100 except as needed for the administration of voter registration. 1101 (5)(7)âThe Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 1102 shall collect data determined necessary by the Department of 1103 State for program evaluation and reporting to the Election 1104 Assistance Commission pursuant to federal law. 1105 (6)(8)âThe Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 1106 shall must ensure that all voter registration services provided 1107 by driver license offices are in compliance with all state and 1108 federal laws the Voting Rights Act of 1965. 1109 (7)(9)âThe Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 1110 shall retain complete records of voter registration information 1111 received, processed, and submitted to the Department of State 1112 statewide voter registration system by the Department of Highway 1113 Safety and Motor Vehicles. The retention of such These records 1114 is shall be for the explicit purpose of supporting audit and 1115 accounting controls established to ensure accurate and complete 1116 electronic transmission of records between the Department of 1117 State statewide voter registration system and the Department of 1118 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles. 1119 (8)(10)âThe Department of State shall provide the 1120 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles with an 1121 electronic database of street addresses valid for use as the 1122 address of legal residence as required in s. 97.053(5). The 1123 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles shall compare 1124 the address provided by the applicant against the database of 1125 valid street addresses. If the address provided by the applicant 1126 does not match a valid street address in the database, the 1127 applicant will be asked to verify the address provided. The 1128 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles may shall not 1129 reject any application for voter registration for which a valid 1130 match cannot be made. 1131 (9)(11)âThe Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 1132 shall enter into an agreement with the Department of State to 1133 match information in the statewide voter registration system 1134 with information in the database of the Department of Highway 1135 Safety and Motor Vehicles to the extent required to verify the 1136 accuracy of the driver license number, Florida identification 1137 number, or last four digits of the social security number 1138 provided on applications for voter registration as required in 1139 s. 97.053. 1140 (10)(12)âThe Department of Highway Safety and Motor 1141 Vehicles shall enter into an agreement with the Commissioner of 1142 Social Security as required by the Help America Vote Act of 2002 1143 to verify the last four digits of the social security number 1144 provided in applications for voter registration as required in 1145 s. 97.053. 1146 (11)(13)âThe Department of Highway Safety and Motor 1147 Vehicles shall must assist the Department of State in regularly 1148 identifying changes in residence address on the driver license 1149 or identification card of a voter. The Department of State shall 1150 must report each such change to the appropriate supervisor of 1151 elections who must change the voterâs registration records in 1152 accordance with s. 98.065(4). 1153 (12)âThe Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 1154 shall notify the Department of State as soon as practicable, but 1155 no later than 30 days, after any change to a voterâs driver 1156 license number or identification card number. The Department of 1157 State shall transmit each such change to the appropriate 1158 supervisor of elections, who shall update the voterâs 1159 registration records accordingly and provide notice of the 1160 change to the registrant by mail. Under no circumstances may a 1161 change to a voterâs driver license or identification card number 1162 be used as the sole basis to prevent an otherwise eligible 1163 citizen from casting his or her ballot. 1164 (14)âThe Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 1165 shall ensure that information technology processes and updates 1166 do not alter an applicantâs party affiliation without the 1167 written consent of the applicant. 1168 Section 8.âSection 97.0575, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1169 read: 1170 97.0575âThird-party voter registration organizations.â 1171 (1)âBefore engaging in any voter registration activities, a 1172 third-party voter registration organization must register and 1173 provide to the division, in an electronic format, the following 1174 information: 1175 (a)âThe names of the officers of the organization and the 1176 name and permanent address of the organization. 1177 (b)âThe name and address of the organizationâs registered 1178 agent in this the state. 1179 (c)âThe names, permanent addresses, and temporary 1180 addresses, if any, of each registration agent who registers 1181 registering persons to vote in this state for compensation on 1182 behalf of the organization. This paragraph does not apply to 1183 persons who only solicit applications and do not collect or 1184 handle voter registration applications. 1185 (d)âBeginning November 6, 2024, the specific general 1186 election cycle for which the third-party voter registration 1187 organization is registering persons to vote. 1188 (e)âAn affirmation that each person collecting or handling 1189 voter registration applications on behalf of the third-party 1190 voter registration organization has not been convicted of a 1191 felony violation of the Election Code, a felony violation of an 1192 offense specified in s. 825.103, a felony offense specified in 1193 s. 98.0751(2)(b) or (c), or a felony offense specified in 1194 chapter 817, chapter 831, or chapter 837. A third-party voter 1195 registration organization is liable for a fine in the amount of 1196 $50,000 for each such person who has been convicted of a felony 1197 violation of the Election Code, a felony violation of an offense 1198 specified in s. 825.103, a felony offense specified in s. 1199 98.0751(2)(b) or (c), or a felony offense specified in chapter 1200 817, chapter 831, or chapter 837 who is collecting or handling 1201 voter registration applications on behalf of the third-party 1202 voter registration organization. 1203 (f)âAn affirmation that each person collecting or handling 1204 voter registration applications on behalf of the third-party 1205 voter registration organization is a citizen of the United 1206 States of America. A third-party voter registration organization 1207 is liable for a fine in the amount of $50,000 for each such 1208 person who is not a citizen and is collecting or handling voter 1209 registration applications on behalf of the third-party voter 1210 registration organization. 1211 (2)âBeginning November 6, 2024, the registration of a 1212 third-party voter registration organization automatically 1213 expires at the conclusion of the specific general election cycle 1214 for which the third-party voter registration organization is 1215 registered. 1216 (3)âThe division or the supervisor of elections shall make 1217 voter registration forms available to third-party voter 1218 registration organizations. All such forms must contain 1219 information identifying the organization to which the forms are 1220 provided. The division shall maintain a database of all third 1221 party voter registration organizations and the voter 1222 registration forms assigned to the third-party voter 1223 registration organization. Each supervisor of elections shall 1224 provide to the division information on voter registration forms 1225 assigned to and received from third-party voter registration 1226 organizations. The information must be provided in a format and 1227 at times as required by the division by rule. The division shall 1228 update information on third-party voter registrations daily and 1229 make the information publicly available. 1230 (4)âA third-party voter registration organization that 1231 collects voter registration applications shall provide a receipt 1232 to an applicant upon accepting possession of his or her 1233 application. The division shall adopt by rule a uniform format 1234 for the receipt by October 1, 2023. The format must include, but 1235 need not be limited to, the name of the applicant, the date the 1236 application is received, the name of the third-party voter 1237 registration organization, the name of the registration agent, 1238 the applicantâs political party affiliation, and the county in 1239 which the applicant resides. 1240 (3)(a)(5)(a)âA third-party voter registration organization 1241 that collects voter registration applications serves as a 1242 fiduciary to the applicant and shall ensure that any voter 1243 registration application entrusted to the organization, 1244 irrespective of party affiliation, race, ethnicity, or gender, 1245 is promptly delivered to the division or the supervisor of 1246 elections in the county in which the applicant resides within 14 1247 10 days after the application is completed by the applicant, but 1248 not after registration closes for the next ensuing election. If 1249 a voter registration application collected by any third-party 1250 voter registration organization is not promptly delivered to the 1251 division or supervisor of elections in the county in which the 1252 applicant resides, the third-party voter registration 1253 organization is liable for the following fines: 1254 1.âA fine in the amount of $50 per each day late, up to 1255 $2,500, for each application received by the division or the 1256 supervisor of elections in the county in which the applicant 1257 resides more than 14 10 days after the applicant delivered the 1258 completed voter registration application to the third-party 1259 voter registration organization, if the organization or any 1260 person, entity, or agent acting on its behalf acted willfully. A 1261 fine in the amount of $2,500 for each application received if 1262 the third-party voter registration organization or person, 1263 entity, or agency acting on its behalf acted willfully. 1264 2.âA fine in the amount of $100 per each day late, up to 1265 $5,000, for each application collected by a third-party voter 1266 registration organization, or any person, entity, or agent 1267 acting on its behalf, before book closing for any given election 1268 for federal or state office and received by the division or the 1269 supervisor of elections in the county in which the applicant 1270 resides after the book-closing deadline for such election. A 1271 fine in the amount of $5,000 for each application received if 1272 the third-party voter registration organization or any person, 1273 entity, or agency acting on its behalf acted willfully. 1274 3.âA fine in the amount of $500 for each application 1275 collected by a third-party voter registration organization, or 1276 any person, entity, or agent acting on its behalf, which is not 1277 submitted to the division or supervisor of elections in the 1278 county in which the applicant resides. A fine in the amount of 1279 $5,000 for any application not submitted if the third-party 1280 voter registration organization or person, entity, or agency 1281 acting on its behalf acted willfully. 1282 1283 The aggregate fine that which may be assessed pursuant to this 1284 paragraph against a third-party voter registration organization, 1285 including affiliate organizations, for violations committed in a 1286 calendar year is $1,000 $250,000. 1287 (b)âA showing by the third-party voter registration 1288 organization that the failure to deliver the voter registration 1289 application within the required timeframe is based upon force 1290 majeure or impossibility of performance shall be an affirmative 1291 defense to a violation of this subsection. The secretary may 1292 waive the fines described in this subsection upon a showing that 1293 the failure to deliver the voter registration application 1294 promptly is based upon force majeure or impossibility of 1295 performance. 1296 (c)âAll fines collected under this section must be remitted 1297 by the department to the supervisor of elections of the county 1298 in which the violation occurred. The supervisor shall expend 1299 monies collected from such fines exclusively for nonpartisan 1300 voter participation initiatives and voter registration outreach, 1301 including voter education, community registration drives, and to 1302 offset costs associated with the prepayment of postage on vote 1303 by-mail return envelopes, provided that all vote-by-mail ballots 1304 for the election include prepaid postage. 1305 (6)âIf a person collecting voter registration applications 1306 on behalf of a third-party voter registration organization 1307 alters the voter registration application of any other person, 1308 without the other personâs knowledge and consent, in violation 1309 of s. 104.012(4) and is subsequently convicted of such offense, 1310 the applicable third-party voter registration organization is 1311 liable for a fine in the amount of $5,000 for each application 1312 altered. 1313 (7)âIf a person collecting voter registration applications 1314 on behalf of a third-party voter registration organization 1315 copies a voterâs application or retains a voterâs personal 1316 information, such as the voterâs Florida driver license number, 1317 Florida identification card number, social security number, or 1318 signature, for any reason other than to provide such application 1319 or information to the third-party voter registration 1320 organization in compliance with this section, the person commits 1321 a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 1322 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 1323 (4)(8)âIf the Secretary of State reasonably believes that a 1324 person has committed a violation of this section, the secretary 1325 may refer the matter to the Attorney General for enforcement. 1326 The Attorney General may institute a civil action for a 1327 violation of this section or to prevent a violation of this 1328 section. An action for relief may include a permanent or 1329 temporary injunction, a restraining order, or any other 1330 appropriate order. 1331 (9)âThe division shall adopt by rule a form to elicit 1332 specific information concerning the facts and circumstances from 1333 a person who claims to have been registered to vote by a third 1334 party voter registration organization but who does not appear as 1335 an active voter on the voter registration rolls. The division 1336 shall also adopt rules to ensure the integrity of the 1337 registration process, including controls to ensure that all 1338 completed forms are promptly delivered to the division or a 1339 supervisor in the county in which the applicant resides. 1340 (5)(10)âThe date on which an applicant signs a voter 1341 registration application is presumed to be the date on which the 1342 third-party voter registration organization received or 1343 collected the voter registration application. 1344 (11)âA third-party voter registration organization may not 1345 mail or otherwise provide a voter registration application upon 1346 which any information about an applicant has been filled in 1347 before it is provided to the applicant. A third-party voter 1348 registration organization that violates this section is liable 1349 for a fine in the amount of $50 for each such application. 1350 (12)âThe requirements of this section are retroactive for 1351 any third-party voter registration organization registered with 1352 the department as of July 1, 2023, and must be complied with 1353 within 90 days after the department provides notice to the 1354 third-party voter registration organization of the requirements 1355 contained in this section. Failure of the third-party voter 1356 registration organization to comply with the requirements within 1357 90 days after receipt of the notice shall automatically result 1358 in the cancellation of the third-party voter registration 1359 organizationâs registration. 1360 Section 9.âPart III of chapter 97, Florida Statutes, 1361 consisting of sections 97.21-97.28, Florida Statutes, is created 1362 and entitled âFlorida Voting Rights Act.â 1363 Section 10.âSection 97.21, Florida Statutes, is created to 1364 read: 1365 97.21âProhibitions on voter suppression and vote dilution.â 1366 (1)âPROHIBITING VOTER SUPPRESSION.â 1367 (a)âA local government, state agency, or state official may 1368 not implement, impose, or enforce any election policy or 1369 practice, or take any other action or fail to take any action, 1370 which results in, will result in, or is intended to result in 1371 any of the following: 1372 1.âA material disparity in voter participation, access to 1373 voting opportunities, or the opportunity or ability to 1374 participate in the political process between protected class 1375 members and other members of the electorate. 1376 2.âBased on the totality of the circumstances, an 1377 impairment of the equal opportunity or ability of protected 1378 class members to participate in any stage of the political 1379 process. 1380 (b)âIt is not a violation of paragraph (a) if a local 1381 government, state agency, or state official demonstrates by 1382 clear and convincing evidence that: 1383 1.âThe election policy or practice is necessary, beyond 1384 consideration of administrative convenience, generalized cost 1385 savings, or speculative concerns, to further significantly an 1386 important and particularized governmental interest; and 1387 2.âThere is no reasonable alternative election policy or 1388 practice that results in a smaller disparity between protected 1389 class members and other members of the electorate. 1390 (c)âNotwithstanding paragraph (b), a violation always 1391 exists under paragraph (a) if: 1392 1.âThe local government, state agency, or state official 1393 takes action intended to result in a material disparity; or 1394 2.âThe material disparity results from: 1395 a.âThe closure, relocation, or consolidation of, or failure 1396 to provide, one or more polling places, early voting sites, or 1397 secure ballot intake stations; or the reassignment of voters to 1398 precincts or polling places or of precincts to polling places; 1399 b.âThe local governmentâs selection of or change to the 1400 time or date of an election; 1401 c.âThe local government conducting elections on dates that 1402 do not align with federal or state elections; 1403 d.âThe date the local government selects for a special 1404 election, and there exists an alternate date in a reasonable 1405 timeframe in which the disparity would be materially less 1406 significant; or 1407 e.âThe failure to schedule a special election as soon as 1408 practicable, but in no event later than 14 days after the 1409 occurrence of the vacancy, if more than 12 months remain in the 1410 term of office and protected class members are generally able to 1411 elect candidates of their choice. 1412 (2)âPROHIBITING VOTE DILUTION.â 1413 (a)âA local government may not employ an at-large method of 1414 election, a district-based method of election, a share-based 1415 method of election, or any other method of election for any 1416 office which has the effect, will likely have the effect, or is 1417 motivated in part by the intent of diluting the vote of 1418 protected class members. 1419 (b)âTo establish a violation under paragraph (a), it must 1420 be established that: 1421 1.a.âElections in the local government exhibit racially 1422 polarized voting resulting in an impairment of the equal 1423 opportunity or ability of protected class members to nominate or 1424 elect candidates of their choice; or 1425 b.âBased on the totality of the circumstances, the equal 1426 opportunity or ability of protected class members to nominate or 1427 elect candidates of their choice is impaired; and 1428 2.âAnother method of election or changes to the existing 1429 method of election which could be constitutionally adopted or 1430 ordered under s. 97.28 would likely mitigate the impairment. For 1431 the purpose of satisfying such requirement, it is not necessary 1432 for the total number or share of protected class members to 1433 exceed any numerical threshold in any district or in the local 1434 government as a whole. 1435 (3)âGUIDELINES AND RELEVANT CIRCUMSTANCES FOR EVALUATING 1436 VOTER SUPPRESSION AND VOTE DILUTION.â 1437 (a)1.âTo evaluate the totality of circumstances under 1438 subparagraph (1)(a)2. or sub-subparagraph (2)(b)1.b., the 1439 following factors may be relevant: 1440 a.âThe history of discrimination; 1441 b.âThe extent to which the protected class members have 1442 been elected to office; 1443 c.âThe use of any election policy or practice that may 1444 enhance the dilutive effective of a method of election in the 1445 local government. 1446 d.âThe extent to which protected class members or 1447 candidates experienced any history of unequal access to 1448 election-administration or campaign finance processes that 1449 determine which candidates will receive access to the ballot or 1450 receive financial or other support in a given election for an 1451 office of the local government; 1452 e.âThe extent to which protected class members have 1453 historically made expenditures as defined in s. 106.011 at lower 1454 rates than other voters; 1455 f.âThe extent to which protected class members vote at 1456 lower rates than other voters; 1457 g.âThe extent to which protected class members are 1458 disadvantaged or otherwise bear the effects of public or private 1459 discrimination in areas that may hinder their ability to 1460 participate effectively in any stage of the political process, 1461 such as education, employment, health, criminal justice, 1462 housing, transportation, land use, or environmental protection; 1463 h.âThe use of overt or subtle racial appeals in political 1464 campaigns by governmental officials or in connection with the 1465 adoption or maintenance of the election policy or practice; 1466 i.âThe extent to which candidates face hostility or 1467 barriers while campaigning due to their membership in a 1468 protected class; 1469 jâThe lack of responsiveness by elected officials to the 1470 particular needs of protected class members or a community of 1471 protected class members; 1472 k.âWhether the election policy or practice was designed to 1473 advance, and does materially advance, a valid and substantial 1474 state interest; and 1475 l.âOther factors deemed relevant. 1476 2.âA set number or combination of the factors in 1477 subparagraph 1. is not required to determine that a violation 1478 occurred. 1479 3.âEvidence of these factors is most probative if it 1480 relates to the local government in which the alleged violation 1481 occurred, but still holds probative value if it relates to the 1482 geographic region in which the local government is located or to 1483 this state. 1484 (b)âTo determine whether elections in the local government 1485 exhibit racially polarized voting under sub-subparagraph 1486 (2)(b)1.a.: 1487 1.âRacially polarized voting must be assessed based on 1488 relevant election results, which may include, but are not 1489 limited to, elections for offices of the local government; 1490 elections held by the local government for other offices, such 1491 as state or federal offices; ballot measures; and other 1492 electoral choices that bear on the rights and privileges of the 1493 protected class. 1494 a.âA set number or combination of elections may not be 1495 required to establish the existence of racially polarized 1496 voting. 1497 b.âEvidence of nonpolarized voting in elections for offices 1498 outside the local government may not preclude a finding of 1499 racially polarized voting based on elections for offices of the 1500 local government. 1501 c.âNonstatistical or nonquantitative evidence may not 1502 preclude a finding of racially polarized voting based on 1503 statistical or quantitative evidence. 1504 d.âLow turnout or registration rates among protected class 1505 members may not preclude a finding of racially polarized voting. 1506 2.âRacially polarized voting may be assessed based only on 1507 the combined electoral preferences of members of a protected 1508 class or classes. There is no requirement that the electoral 1509 preferences of each protected class or any subgroup within a 1510 protected class be separately polarized from those of other 1511 voters. 1512 3.âThe causes of or reasons for racially polarized voting, 1513 including partisan explanations or discriminatory intent, are 1514 not relevant. 1515 (c)1.âIf evaluating whether a violation of subsection (1) 1516 or subsection (2) is present, the following circumstances are 1517 never relevant to such a violation: 1518 a.âThe total number or share of protected class members on 1519 whom the election policy or practice does not impose a material 1520 burden; 1521 b.âThe degree to which the election policy or practice has 1522 a long pedigree or was in widespread use at some earlier date; 1523 c.âThe use of an identical or similar election policy or 1524 practice in other jurisdictions; and 1525 d.âThe availability of forms of voting unimpacted by the 1526 election policy or practice. 1527 2.âA state interest in preventing voter fraud or bolstering 1528 voter confidence in the integrity of elections is not relevant 1529 to an evaluation of whether a violation of subsection (1) or 1530 subsection (2) occurred unless there is substantial evidence of 1531 a number of instances that criminal activity by individual 1532 electors has occurred in the local government and the connection 1533 between the election policy or practice and a state interest in 1534 preventing voter fraud or bolstering voter confidence in the 1535 integrity of elections is supported by substantial evidence. 1536 3.âEvidence concerning the intent of electors, elected 1537 officials, or public officials to discriminate against protected 1538 class members is not required under subsections (1) and (2). 1539 4.âWhether protected class members typically elect 1540 candidates of their choice to the governmental body of a local 1541 government in approximate proportion to their total number or 1542 share of the population may be relevant under subsection (2). 1543 (4)âBefore filing an action against a local government 1544 pursuant to this section, a prospective plaintiff must send, by 1545 certified mail, return receipt requested, a notification letter 1546 to the local government asserting that the local government may 1547 be in violation of the provisions of this act. Such letter must 1548 be referred to as an âFLVRA notification letter.â 1549 (a)âExcept as noted in paragraph (e), a party may not file 1550 an action against a local government pursuant to this section 1551 earlier than 50 days after sending an FLVRA notification letter 1552 to the local government. 1553 (b)âBefore receiving an FLVRA notification letter, or not 1554 later than 50 days after any FLVRA notification letter is sent 1555 to a local government, a local government may adopt a resolution 1556 that must be referred to as an âFLVRA resolutionâ and that does 1557 all of the following: 1558 1.âIdentifies a potential violation of this section by the 1559 local government. 1560 2.âIdentifies a specific remedy to the potential violation. 1561 3.âAffirms the local governmentâs intent to enact and 1562 implement the remedy for the potential violation. 1563 4.âSets forth specific measures the local government will 1564 take to enact and implement the remedy. 1565 5.âProvides a schedule for the enactment and implementation 1566 of the remedy. 1567 (c)âExcept as noted in paragraph (e), a party that has sent 1568 an FLVRA notification letter may not file an action pursuant to 1569 this section earlier than 90 days after the adoption of an FLVRA 1570 resolution. 1571 (d)âIf the remedy identified in an FLVRA resolution is 1572 barred by state or local law, or a legislative body of a local 1573 government lacks authority under state or local law to enact or 1574 implement a remedy identified in an FLVRA resolution within 90 1575 days after the adoption of such resolution, or if the local 1576 government is a covered jurisdiction under s. 97.25, the local 1577 government may nonetheless enact and implement the remedy 1578 identified in such resolution upon approval of the FLVRA 1579 Commission, which may provide approval only if it finds that the 1580 local government may be in violation of this act, the proposed 1581 remedy would address a potential violation, and implementation 1582 of the proposed remedy is feasible. The approval of a remedy by 1583 the FLVRA Commission does not bar an action to challenge the 1584 remedy. 1585 (e)âIf, pursuant to this subsection, a local government 1586 enacts or implements a remedy or the FLVRA Commission approves a 1587 proposed remedy, a party that sent an FLVRA notification letter 1588 may submit a claim for reimbursement from the local government 1589 for the costs associated with producing and sending such 1590 notification letter. The party must submit the claim in writing 1591 and substantiate the claim with financial documentation, 1592 including a detailed invoice for any demography services or 1593 analysis of voting patterns in the local government. If a party 1594 and local government fail to agree to a reimbursement amount, 1595 either the party or local government may file an action for a 1596 declaratory judgment for a clarification of rights. 1597 (f)âNotwithstanding this subsection, a party may bring a 1598 cause of action for a violation of this section under any of the 1599 following circumstances: 1600 1.âThe action is commenced within 1 year after the adoption 1601 of a challenged method of election, ordinance, resolution, rule, 1602 policy, standard, regulation, procedure, or law. 1603 2.âThe prospect of obtaining relief under this section 1604 would be futile. 1605 3.âAnother party has submitted a notification letter under 1606 this subsection alleging a substantially similar violation and 1607 that party is eligible to bring a cause of action under this 1608 subsection. 1609 4.âFollowing the partyâs submission of an FLVRA 1610 notification letter, the local government has adopted an FLVRA 1611 resolution that identifies a remedy that would not cure the 1612 violation identified in the notification letter. 1613 5.âThe party is seeking preliminary relief with respect to 1614 an upcoming election in accordance with s. 97.28. 1615 (g)âAny local government that receives an FLVRA 1616 notification letter or adopts an FLVRA resolution must provide a 1617 copy to the FLVRA Commission within 1 day after receipt or 1618 adoption. The FLVRA Commission shall promptly, but not later 1619 than 1 business day after receipt, post all FLVRA notification 1620 letters and FLVRA resolutions on its website. The FLVRA 1621 Commission may adopt rules identifying other materials and 1622 information that must be provided to the FLVRA Commission by 1623 local governments, as well as procedures for transmittal of 1624 materials and information from local governments to the FLVRA 1625 Commission. 1626 (5)âA local government may not assert the doctrine of 1627 laches as a defense to claims brought under this section. A 1628 local government may not assert that plaintiffs have failed to 1629 comply with any notice, exhaustion, or other procedural 1630 requirements under state law, other than the requirements in 1631 this section, as a defense to claims brought under this section. 1632 (6)âAn individual or entity aggrieved by a violation of 1633 this section, the Attorney General, or the FLVRA Commission may 1634 file an action alleging a violation of this section to enforce 1635 compliance with this section. An entity aggrieved by a violation 1636 of this section includes, but is not limited to, any entity 1637 whose membership includes individuals aggrieved by a violation 1638 of this section or whose mission would be frustrated by a 1639 violation of this section, including, but not limited to, an 1640 entity that would expend or divest resources to fulfill its 1641 mission as a result of such violation or must expend greater 1642 resources or efforts to advocate before an elected body that is 1643 less responsive to the entity or its members due to the alleged 1644 violation. An entity may not be compelled to disclose the 1645 identity of any specific member to pursue a claim on behalf of 1646 its members. This subsection must be liberally construed to 1647 confer standing as broadly as the State Constitution allows. 1648 Such a claim may be filed pursuant to the Florida Rules of Civil 1649 Procedure or in the Second Judicial Circuit of Florida. Members 1650 of two or more protected classes that are politically cohesive 1651 in a local government may jointly file an action. In an action 1652 involving a districting plan, any individual who resides in the 1653 defendant jurisdiction and is a member of the affected class or 1654 classes, whether he or she resides in any particular district, 1655 may challenge the districting plan as a whole. 1656 Section 11.âSection 97.22, Florida Statutes, is created to 1657 read: 1658 97.22âFlorida Voting Rights Act Commission.â 1659 (1)âThere is created the Florida Voting Rights Act (FLVRA) 1660 Commission within the Department of State. The FLVRA Commission 1661 is a separate budget entity, as provided in the General 1662 Appropriations Act, and shall prepare and submit a budget 1663 request in accordance with chapter 216. The commission is 1664 responsible for administering the Florida Voting Rights Act. The 1665 commission shall have its own staff, including management, 1666 research, and enforcement personnel, and is not subject to 1667 control, supervision, or direction by the Department of State. 1668 (2)(a)âThe FLVRA Commission shall be composed of five 1669 commissioners, each of whom shall serve a staggered 5-year term. 1670 Commissioners must be compensated for their actual time spent on 1671 the commissionâs business at an hourly rate equivalent to the 1672 rate of an assistant attorney general. 1673 1.âA nominating committee shall identify qualified 1674 candidates to serve as commissioners. The nominating committee 1675 shall be composed of nominating organizations that are selected 1676 as follows: 1677 a.âOrganizations may apply to the Secretary of State to be 1678 certified as organizational nominators for 5-year terms, after 1679 which the organizations may be recertified. The Secretary of 1680 State must certify any organization that applies to be an 1681 organizational nominator if it meets all of the following 1682 qualifications: 1683 (I)âHas demonstrated commitment to the purposes of this act 1684 and to securing the voting rights of protected class members, 1685 such as referencing such class members in the organizationâs 1686 mission statement, involvement in numerous voting rights cases 1687 brought in this state on behalf of members of protected classes, 1688 or advocacy in support of this act. 1689 (II)âIs registered as a nonprofit corporation with the 1690 Secretary of State. 1691 (III)âHas been in continuous operation as a nonprofit 1692 organization under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or 1693 as a nonprofit corporation registered with the Secretary of 1694 State for at least 10 years. 1695 b.âIf the Secretary of State fails to timely certify an 1696 organization that satisfies the qualifications specified in sub 1697 subparagraph a. following the organizationâs application as an 1698 organizational nominator, the organization may file an action 1699 against the Secretary of State for a declaratory judgment 1700 certifying the organization as an organizational nominator. 1701 2.âAn organizational nominator may be removed for cause by 1702 a majority vote of all fellow nominators. 1703 3.âIf there are fewer than 16 organizational nominators 1704 certified by the Secretary of State, the nominating committee 1705 must be composed of all such organizational nominators. If there 1706 are 16 or more organizational nominators certified by the 1707 Secretary of State, the nominating committee must be composed of 1708 15 organizational nominators randomly selected from all the 1709 nominators by lot on an annual basis. 1710 4.âThe nominating committee shall select its own chair to 1711 preside over meetings and votes. 1712 (b)âCommissioners shall be selected as follows: 1713 1.âThe nominating committee shall solicit applications from 1714 individuals to serve on the FLVRA Commission from across this 1715 state. A commissioner must satisfy all of the following 1716 criteria: 1717 a.âIs a resident of this state. 1718 b.âHas experience representing or advocating on behalf of 1719 members of protected classes. 1720 c.âHas not served in elected office within the preceding 5 1721 years. 1722 d.âIs not currently serving in any governmental office or 1723 holding any political party office. 1724 2.âThe nominating committee shall maintain a qualified 1725 candidate pool composed of 30 candidates to serve on the FLVRA 1726 Commission. Individuals may be added to the qualified applicant 1727 pool only upon a vote of three-fifths of the nominating 1728 committee. 1729 3.âAll members of the FLVRA Commission must be randomly 1730 selected from the qualified candidate pool. Upon the initial 1731 formation of the FLVRA Commission, five commissioners must be 1732 selected by lot from the qualified candidate pool and randomly 1733 assigned to term lengths of 5 years, 4 years, 3 years, 2 years, 1734 and 1 year. At least 60 days in advance of the conclusion of 1735 each commissionerâs term, a new commissioner must be randomly 1736 selected by lot from the qualified candidate pool to serve a 5 1737 year term upon the conclusion of the incumbent commissionerâs 1738 term. If a vacancy occurs, a new commissioner must be randomly 1739 selected by lot from the qualified candidate pool within 30 days 1740 after the vacancy occurring to complete the vacated term. 1741 (3)âIn any action or investigation to enforce this section, 1742 the FLVRA Commission may subpoena witnesses; administer oaths; 1743 examine individuals under oath; determine material facts; and 1744 compel the production of records, books, papers, contracts, and 1745 other documents in accordance with the Florida Rules of Civil 1746 Procedure. 1747 (4)âThe FLVRA Commission may hire any staff and make any 1748 expenditure necessary to fulfill its responsibilities. 1749 (5)âThe FLVRA Commission may adopt rules to administer and 1750 enforce this part. 1751 Section 12.âSection 97.23, Florida Statutes, is created to 1752 read: 1753 97.23âStatewide database and institute.â 1754 (1)âThe FLVRA Commission shall enter into an agreement with 1755 one or more postsecondary educational institutions in this state 1756 to create the Florida Voting and Elections Database and 1757 Institute to maintain and administer a central repository of 1758 elections and voting data available to the public from all local 1759 governments in this state, and to foster, pursue, and sponsor 1760 research on existing laws and best practices in voting and 1761 elections. The parties to that agreement shall enter into a 1762 memorandum of understanding that includes the process for 1763 selecting the director of the database and institute. 1764 (2)âThe database and institute shall provide a center for 1765 research, training, and information on voting systems and 1766 election administration. The database and institute may do any 1767 of the following: 1768 (a)âConduct noncredit classes and classes for credit. 1769 (b)âOrganize interdisciplinary groups of scholars to 1770 research voting and elections in this state. 1771 (c)âConduct seminars involving voting and elections. 1772 (d)âEstablish a nonpartisan centralized database in order 1773 to collect, archive, and make publicly available, at no cost, 1774 accessible data pertaining to elections, voter registration, and 1775 ballot access in this state. 1776 (e)âAssist in the dissemination of election data to the 1777 public. 1778 (f)âPublish books and periodicals on voting and elections 1779 in this state. 1780 (g)âProvide nonpartisan technical assistance to local 1781 governments, scholars, and the general public seeking to use the 1782 resources of the database and institute. 1783 (3)âThe database and institute shall make available, and 1784 maintain in an electronic format, all relevant election and 1785 voting data and records for at least the previous 12-year 1786 period. The data, information, and estimates maintained by the 1787 database and institute must be posted online and made available 1788 to the public at no cost. Maps, polling places, and vote-by-mail 1789 ballot secure intake stations must be made available in a 1790 geospatial file format. The database and institute shall prepare 1791 all estimates made under this section by applying the most 1792 advanced and validated peer-reviewed methodologies available. 1793 Data and records that must be maintained include, but are not 1794 limited to, all of the following: 1795 (a)âEstimates of the total population, voting age 1796 population, and citizen voting age population by racial, color, 1797 or language minority group and disability status, broken down by 1798 precinct level on a year-by-year basis, for every local 1799 government in this state, based on data from the United States 1800 Census Bureau or the American Community Survey or data of 1801 comparable quality collected by a public office. 1802 (b)âElection results at the precinct level for every 1803 federal, state, and local election held in every local 1804 government in this state. 1805 (c)âContemporaneous voter registration lists, voter history 1806 files, polling places, and vote-by-mail secure ballot intake 1807 stations for every election in every local government in this 1808 state. 1809 (d)âContemporaneous maps or other documentation of the 1810 configuration of precincts. 1811 (e)âLists of polling places, including, but not limited to, 1812 lists of precincts assigned to each polling place, if 1813 applicable. 1814 (f)âAdopted district or redistricting plans for every 1815 election in every local government in this state. 1816 (g)âA current record, updated monthly, of persons eligible 1817 to register to vote who have a prior criminal conviction and 1818 whose eligibility has been restored in compliance with s. 1819 98.0751. 1820 (h)âAny other data that the director of the database and 1821 institute considers necessary to maintain in furtherance of the 1822 purposes of the database and institute. 1823 (4)âAll state agencies and local governments shall timely 1824 provide the director of the database and institute with any 1825 information requested by the director. No later than 90 days 1826 after an election, each local government shall transmit to the 1827 database and institute copies of all of the following: 1828 (a)âElection results at the precinct level. 1829 (b)âContemporaneous voter registration lists. 1830 (c)âVoter history files. 1831 (d)âMaps, descriptions, and shapefiles for election 1832 districts. 1833 (e)âLists of polling places, shapefiles, or descriptions of 1834 the precincts assigned to each polling place. 1835 (f)âAny other data as requested by the database and 1836 institute. 1837 (5)âAny state entity identified by the director of the 1838 database and institute as possessing data, statistics, or other 1839 information required by the database and institute to carry out 1840 its duties and responsibilities shall provide such data, 1841 statistics, or information annually to the database and 1842 institute at the request of the director. 1843 (6)âIf a state agency or local government fails to provide 1844 any information to the database and institute as required by 1845 this section, the director of the database and institute, the 1846 Attorney General, or the FLVRA Commission may file an action to 1847 enforce compliance with this section. An entity aggrieved by a 1848 violation of this section includes, but is not limited to, any 1849 entity whose membership includes individuals aggrieved by this 1850 section or whose mission would be frustrated by a violation of 1851 this section, including, but not limited to, an entity that 1852 would expend or divest resources to fulfill its mission as a 1853 result of such violation or must expend greater resources or 1854 efforts to advocate before an elected body that is less 1855 responsive to the entity or its members due to the alleged 1856 violation. An entity may not be compelled to disclose the 1857 identity of any specific member to pursue a claim on behalf of 1858 its members. This section must be liberally construed to confer 1859 standing as broadly as the State Constitution allows. Such claim 1860 may be filed pursuant to the Florida Rules of Civil Procedure or 1861 in the Second Judicial Circuit of Florida. 1862 (7)âNo later than 90 days after the end of each state 1863 fiscal year, the database and institute shall publish a report 1864 on the priorities and finances of the database and institute. 1865 (8)âThe database and institute shall provide nonpartisan 1866 technical assistance to local governments, researchers, and 1867 members of the public seeking to use the resources of the 1868 database. 1869 (9)âThere is a rebuttable presumption that the data, 1870 estimates, or other information maintained by the database and 1871 institute is valid. 1872 Section 13.âSection 97.24, Florida Statutes, is created to 1873 read: 1874 97.24âLanguage access.â 1875 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 1876 (a)ââLimited English proficient individualâ means an 1877 individual who does not speak English as his or her primary 1878 language and who speaks, reads, or understands the English 1879 language other than âvery wellâ in accordance with United States 1880 Census Bureau data or data of comparable quality collected by a 1881 governmental entity. 1882 (b)ââNative Americanâ includes any person recognized by the 1883 United States Census Bureau or the state as âAmerican Indian.â 1884 (2)âThe FLVRA Commission must designate one or more 1885 languages, other than English, for which assistance in voting 1886 and elections must be provided by a local government if the 1887 commission finds that a significant and substantial need exists 1888 for such assistance. 1889 (3)âBased on the best available data, which may include 1890 information from the United States Census Bureauâs American 1891 Community Survey or data of comparable quality collected by a 1892 governmental entity, the FLVRA Commission must find that a 1893 significant and substantial need exists if: 1894 (a)âMore than 2 percent, but no fewer than 200 citizens of 1895 voting age, of a local government speak a language other than 1896 English and are limited English proficient individuals. 1897 (b)âMore than 4,000 citizens of voting age of a local 1898 government speak a language other than English and are limited 1899 English proficient individuals. 1900 (4)âIn the case of a local government that contains any 1901 part of a Native American reservation, if more than 2 percent of 1902 the Native American citizens of voting age within the Native 1903 American reservation are proficient in a language other than 1904 English and are limited English proficient individuals, the 1905 local government must provide materials in such language. 1906 (5)(a)âOn an annual basis, the FLVRA Commission shall 1907 publish on its website a list of all of the following: 1908 1.âEach local government in which assistance in voting and 1909 elections in a language other than English must be provided. 1910 2.âEach language in which such assistance must be provided 1911 in each local government. 1912 (b)âThe FLVRA Commissionâs determinations under this 1913 section are effective upon publication, and the commission shall 1914 distribute this information to each affected local government. 1915 (6)âEach local government described in paragraph (5)(a) 1916 shall provide assistance in voting and elections, including 1917 related materials, in any language designated by the commission 1918 under paragraph (5)(a) to voters in a local government who are 1919 limited English proficient individuals. 1920 (7)âWhenever the FLVRA Commission determines that, pursuant 1921 to this section, language assistance must be provided by a local 1922 government, the local government shall provide competent 1923 assistance in each designated language and provide related 1924 materials in English and in each designated language, including 1925 voter registration or voting notices, forms, instructions, 1926 assistance, ballots, or other materials or information relating 1927 to the electoral process. However, in the case of a language 1928 that is oral or unwritten, including historically unwritten 1929 languages, as may be the case for some Native American 1930 languages, a local government must provide oral instructions, 1931 assistance, or other information on the electoral process in 1932 such language. All materials provided in a designated language 1933 must be of an equal quality to the corresponding English 1934 materials. All provided translations must convey the intent and 1935 essential meaning of the original text or communication and may 1936 not rely solely on automatic translation services. If available, 1937 live translation must be used for language assistance. 1938 (8)âThe FLVRA Commission shall establish a review process 1939 under which the commission determines, upon receipt of a request 1940 submitted under this subsection, whether a significant and 1941 substantial need exists in a local government for a language to 1942 be designated for language access and assistance in voting and 1943 elections if such need has not been found under subsection (3) 1944 or subsection (4). Such process, at a minimum, must include an 1945 opportunity for any voter or entity to submit a request for the 1946 commission to consider designating a language in a local 1947 government; an opportunity for public comment; and a procedure 1948 for determining whether a local government must provide language 1949 assistance. 1950 (9)âAny individual or entity aggrieved by a violation of 1951 this section, the Attorney General, or the FLVRA Commission may 1952 file an action alleging a violation of this section. An entity 1953 aggrieved by a violation of this section includes, but is not 1954 limited to, any entity whose membership includes individuals 1955 aggrieved by this section or whose mission would be frustrated 1956 by a violation of this section, including, but not limited to, 1957 an entity that would expend or divest resources to fulfill its 1958 mission as a result of such violation or must expend greater 1959 resources or efforts to advocate before an elected body that is 1960 less responsive to the entity or its members due to the alleged 1961 violation. An entity may not be compelled to disclose the 1962 identity of any specific member to pursue a claim on behalf of 1963 its members. This section must be liberally construed to confer 1964 standing as broadly as the State Constitution allows. Such a 1965 claim may be filed pursuant to the Florida Rules of Civil 1966 Procedure or in the Second Judicial Circuit of Florida. 1967 Section 14.âSection 97.25, Florida Statutes, is created to 1968 read: 1969 97.25âPreclearance.â 1970 (1)âThe enactment or implementation of a covered policy by 1971 a covered jurisdiction is subject to preclearance by the FLVRA 1972 Commission. 1973 (2)âFor purposes of this section, a covered policy includes 1974 any new or modified: 1975 (a)âElection policy or practice. 1976 (b)âMethod of election, including districting or 1977 redistricting. 1978 (c)âForm of government. 1979 (d)âAnnexation, incorporation, dissolution, consolidation, 1980 or division of a local government. 1981 (e)âRemoval of individuals from registry lists or 1982 enrollment lists and other activities concerning any such list, 1983 except where the removal is at the specific written request of 1984 the voter and other activities concerning any such list. 1985 (f)âHours of any early voting site, or location or number 1986 of early voting sites, polling places, or secure ballot intake 1987 stations. 1988 (g)âAssignment of voting precincts to polling places or 1989 secure ballot intake station locations. 1990 (h)âAssistance offered to protected class members. 1991 (i)âAny additional subject matter the FLVRA Commission may 1992 identify for inclusion in this subsection, pursuant to 1993 commission rule, if the commission determines that any election 1994 policy or practice may have the effect of diminishing the right 1995 to vote of any protected class member or have the effect of 1996 violating this act. 1997 (3)âFollowing each decennial census, if a covered 1998 jurisdiction does not make changes to its method of election, 1999 including, but not limited to, maintaining an at-large method of 2000 election or not making revisions to a district-based method of 2001 election, the method of election must be deemed a covered policy 2002 and must be submitted to the FLVRA Commission pursuant to this 2003 section. 2004 (4)âA covered jurisdiction includes any of the following: 2005 (a)âA local government that, within the preceding 25 years, 2006 has been subject to a court order, government enforcement 2007 action, court-approved consent decree, or other settlement in 2008 which the local government conceded liability, based upon a 2009 violation of this act, the federal Voting Rights Act, the 15th 2010 Amendment to the United States Constitution, a voting-related 2011 violation of the 14th Amendment to the United States 2012 Constitution, or any violation of any other state or federal 2013 election law, concerning discrimination against members of a 2014 protected class. 2015 (b)âA local government that, within the preceding 25 years, 2016 has been subject to any court order, government enforcement 2017 action, court-approved consent decree, or any other settlement 2018 in which the local government conceded liability, based upon a 2019 violation of any state or federal civil rights law or the 14th 2020 Amendment to the United States Constitution, concerning 2021 discrimination against members of a protected class. 2022 (c)âA local government that, during the preceding 3 years, 2023 has failed to comply with its obligation to provide data or 2024 information to the database pursuant to s. 97.23. 2025 (d)âA local government that, during the preceding 25 years, 2026 was found to have enacted or implemented a covered policy 2027 without obtaining preclearance for that policy pursuant to this 2028 section. 2029 (e)âA local government that contains at least 1,000 2030 eligible voters of any protected class, or in which members of 2031 any protected class constitute at least 10 percent of the 2032 eligible voter population of the local government, and in which, 2033 in any year in the preceding 10 years, the percentage of voters 2034 of any protected class in a local government which participated 2035 in any general election for any local government office was at 2036 least 10 percentage points lower than the percentage of all 2037 voters in the local government who participated in such 2038 election. 2039 (f)âA local government that contains at least 1,000 2040 eligible voters of any protected class, or in which members of 2041 any protected class constitute at least 10 percent of the 2042 eligible voter population of the local government, and in which, 2043 in any year in the preceding 10 years, the percentage of 2044 eligible voters of that protected class who were registered to 2045 vote was at least 10 percentage points lower than the percentage 2046 of all eligible voters in the local government who registered to 2047 vote. 2048 (g)âA local government that contains at least 1,000 2049 eligible voters of any protected class, or in which members of 2050 any protected class constitute at least 10 percent of the 2051 eligible voter population of the local government, and in which, 2052 in any year in the preceding 10 years, based on data made 2053 available by the United States Census, the dissimilarity index 2054 of such protected class, calculated using census tracts, was in 2055 excess of 50 percent with respect to the race, color, or 2056 language minority group that comprises a plurality within the 2057 local government. 2058 (h)âA local government that contains at least 1,000 2059 eligible voters of any protected class, or in which members of 2060 any protected class constitute at least 10 percent of the 2061 eligible voter population of the local government, and in which, 2062 in any year in the preceding 10 years, the poverty rate among 2063 the population of such protected class exceeded the poverty rate 2064 among the population of the local government as a whole by at 2065 least 10 percentage points. 2066 (i)âA county that contains at least 1,000 eligible voters 2067 of any protected class, or in which members of any protected 2068 class constitute at least 10 percent of the eligible voter 2069 population of the county, and in which, in any year in the 2070 preceding 10 years, the arrest rate among members of such 2071 protected class exceeded the arrest rate among the population of 2072 the county as a whole by at least 10 percentage points. 2073 (j)âAny school district that contains at least 1,000 2074 eligible voters of any protected class, or in which members of 2075 any protected class constitute at least 10 percent of the 2076 eligible voter population of the school district, and in which, 2077 in any year in the preceding 10 years, the graduation rate of 2078 such protected class was lower than the graduation rate of the 2079 entire district student population by at least 10 percentage 2080 points. 2081 (5)âThe FLVRA Commission shall determine on an annual basis 2082 which local governments are covered jurisdictions and publish a 2083 list of such jurisdictions on its website. 2084 (6)âIf a covered jurisdiction seeks preclearance from the 2085 FLVRA Commission for the adoption or implementation of any 2086 covered policy, the covered jurisdiction must submit the covered 2087 policy to the commission in writing and may obtain preclearance 2088 in accordance with this section. 2089 (a)âThe FLVRA Commission shall review the covered policy 2090 submitted for preclearance, including any comments submitted by 2091 members of the public, and make a determination to grant or deny 2092 preclearance. The covered jurisdiction bears the burden of proof 2093 in any preclearance determinations. 2094 (b)1.âThe FLVRA Commission may deny preclearance to a 2095 submitted covered policy only if it determines that: 2096 a.âThe covered policy is more likely than not to diminish 2097 the opportunity or ability of protected class members to 2098 participate in the political process and elect candidates of 2099 their choice or otherwise influence the outcome of elections; or 2100 b.âThe covered policy is more likely than not to violate 2101 this act. 2102 2.âIf the commission denies preclearance, the applicable 2103 covered jurisdiction may not enact or implement the covered 2104 policy. The commission shall provide a written explanation for a 2105 denial. 2106 (c)âIf the FLVRA Commission grants preclearance to a 2107 covered policy, the covered jurisdiction may immediately enact 2108 or implement the covered policy. A determination by the 2109 commission to grant preclearance is not admissible in, and may 2110 not be considered by, a court in any subsequent action 2111 challenging the covered policy. If the commission fails to deny 2112 or grant preclearance to a submitted covered policy within the 2113 timeframes set forth in paragraph (d), the covered policy is 2114 deemed to be precleared, and the covered jurisdiction may enact 2115 or implement the covered policy. 2116 (d)âIf a covered policy concerns the method of election for 2117 a legislative body, districting or redistricting, the number of 2118 seats on the legislative body, or annexation, incorporation, 2119 dissolution, consolidation, or division of a local government, 2120 the FLVRA Commission must review the covered policy, including 2121 any comments submitted by members of the public, and make a 2122 determination to deny or grant preclearance within 60 days after 2123 the submission of the covered policy. The commission may invoke 2124 up to two extensions of 90 days each to make such a 2125 determination. For all other covered policies, the commission 2126 shall review the covered policy, including any public comment, 2127 and make a determination to deny or grant preclearance within 30 2128 days after the submission of the covered policy. The commission 2129 may invoke an extension of 60 days to make such a determination. 2130 (e)âA denial of preclearance under this section may be 2131 appealed only by the covered jurisdiction and must be filed in 2132 the Second Judicial Circuit. Other parties may not file an 2133 action to appeal a denial of preclearance or intervene in any 2134 such action brought by the covered jurisdiction. 2135 (7)âIf a covered jurisdiction enacts or implements any 2136 covered policy without obtaining preclearance for such covered 2137 policy in accordance with this section, any individual or entity 2138 aggrieved by such violation, the director of the database and 2139 institute, the Attorney General, or the FLVRA Commission may 2140 file an action to enjoin enactment or implementation and seek 2141 sanctions against the covered jurisdiction for violations of 2142 this section. An entity aggrieved by a violation of this section 2143 includes, but is not limited to, any entity whose membership 2144 includes individuals aggrieved by this section or whose mission 2145 would be frustrated by a violation of this section, including, 2146 but not limited to, an entity that would expend or divest 2147 resources to fulfill its mission as a result of such violation 2148 or must expend greater resources or efforts to advocate before 2149 an elected body that is less responsive to the entity or its 2150 members due to the alleged violation. An entity may not be 2151 compelled to disclose the identity of any specific member to 2152 pursue a claim on behalf of its members. This section must be 2153 liberally construed to confer standing as broadly as the State 2154 Constitution allows. Such a claim may be filed pursuant to the 2155 Florida Rules of Civil Procedure or in the Second Judicial 2156 Circuit. A claim under this subsection does not preclude, bar, 2157 or limit in any way any other claims that may be brought 2158 regarding the covered policy, including claims brought under 2159 other sections of this act. 2160 (8)âIf the FLVRA Commission approves preclearance for a 2161 covered policy in violation of this section, identifies or fails 2162 to identify a list of local governments that are covered 2163 jurisdictions in violation of this section, or otherwise fails 2164 to properly implement this section, any individual or entity 2165 aggrieved by such a violation may file an action seeking 2166 appropriate relief, including, but not limited to, injunctive 2167 relief on the commission or any other party, as the court deems 2168 necessary to enforce this section. An entity aggrieved by a 2169 violation of this section includes, but is not limited to, any 2170 entity whose membership includes individuals aggrieved by this 2171 section or whose mission would be frustrated by a violation of 2172 this section, including, but not limited to, an entity that 2173 would expend or divest resources to fulfill its mission as a 2174 result of such violation or must expend greater resources or 2175 efforts to advocate before an elected body that is less 2176 responsive to the entity or its members due to the alleged 2177 violation. An entity may not be compelled to disclose the 2178 identity of any specific member to pursue a claim on behalf of 2179 its members. This section must be liberally construed to confer 2180 standing as broadly as the State Constitution allows. Such a 2181 claim may be filed pursuant to the Florida Rules of Civil 2182 Procedure or in the Second Judicial Circuit of Florida. A claim 2183 under this subsection does not preclude, bar, or limit any other 2184 claims that may be brought regarding any covered policy, 2185 including claims brought under other sections of this act. 2186 (9)âThe FLVRA Commission shall adopt rules to implement 2187 this section, including rules concerning the content of and 2188 procedure for preclearance submission, procedures for public 2189 comment and transparency regarding preclearance determinations, 2190 and procedures for expedited and emergency preclearance 2191 determinations that deviate from the timelines provided in 2192 paragraph (6)(d), provided that such preclearance determinations 2193 are preliminary. 2194 Section 15.âSection 97.26, Florida Statutes, is created to 2195 read: 2196 97.26âVoter intimidation, deception, and obstruction.â 2197 (1)âA person may not, whether acting under color of law or 2198 otherwise, engage in acts of intimidation, deception, or 2199 obstruction, or any other tactic that has the effect of or may 2200 reasonably have the effect of interfering with another personâs 2201 right to vote. 2202 (2)âA violation of subsection (1) includes any of the 2203 following: 2204 (a)âThe use of force or threats to use force, or the use of 2205 any other conduct to practice intimidation, which causes or will 2206 reasonably have the effect of causing interference with an 2207 individualâs right to vote. 2208 (b)âKnowingly using or deploying a deceptive or fraudulent 2209 device, contrivance, or communication that causes or will 2210 reasonably have the effect of causing interference with an 2211 individualâs right to vote. 2212 (c)âThe obstruction of, impediment to, or interference with 2213 access to any early voting site, polling place, secure ballot 2214 intake station, or office of the supervisor of elections in a 2215 manner that causes or will reasonably have the effect of causing 2216 interference with an individualâs right to vote or causing any 2217 delay in voting or the voting process. 2218 (3)(a)âIn any action to enforce this section, there is a 2219 rebuttable presumption that a person has violated this section 2220 if he or she openly carries or brandishes a firearm, an 2221 imitation firearm, a toy gun, a machete, an axe, a sword, or any 2222 weapon as defined in s. 790.001 while: 2223 1.âInteracting with or observing any person voting or 2224 attempting to vote; 2225 2.âUrging or aiding any person to vote or attempt to vote, 2226 whether as part of official election administration activities 2227 or unofficial activities; or 2228 3.âExercising any power or duty in administering elections, 2229 including, but not limited to, vote counting, canvassing, or 2230 certifying returns. 2231 (b)âA law enforcement officer as defined in s. 943.10 2232 acting within the scope of his or her official duties is not 2233 subject to the presumption under paragraph (a), but a court may 2234 nonetheless consider a law enforcement officerâs possession of a 2235 firearm in determining whether the officer violated this 2236 section. 2237 (4)âAny individual or entity aggrieved by a violation of 2238 this section, the Attorney General, or the FLVRA Commission may 2239 file a civil action alleging a violation of this section. An 2240 entity aggrieved by a violation of this section includes, but is 2241 not limited to, any entity whose membership includes individuals 2242 aggrieved by this section or whose mission would be frustrated 2243 by a violation of this section, including, but not limited to, 2244 an entity that would expend or divest resources to fulfill its 2245 mission as a result of such violation or must expend greater 2246 resources or efforts to advocate before an elected body that is 2247 less responsive to the entity or its members due to the alleged 2248 violation. An entity may not be compelled to disclose the 2249 identity of any specific member to pursue a claim on behalf of 2250 its members. This section must be liberally construed to confer 2251 standing as broadly as the State Constitution allows. Such a 2252 claim may be filed pursuant to the Florida Rules of Civil 2253 Procedure or in the Second Judicial Circuit. 2254 (5)âIn addition to any remedies that may be imposed under 2255 s. 97.28, if the court finds a violation of this section, the 2256 court must order appropriate remedies that are tailored to 2257 addressing the violation, including, but not limited to, 2258 providing for additional time for individuals to vote in an 2259 election, a primary, or a referendum and awarding nominal 2260 damages for any violation and compensatory or punitive damages 2261 for any willful violation. 2262 Section 16.âSection 97.27, Florida Statutes, is created to 2263 read: 2264 97.27âDemocracy canon.â 2265 (1)âAny provision of this code and any regulation, charter, 2266 home rule ordinance, or other enactment of the state or any 2267 local government relating to the right to vote must be liberally 2268 construed in favor of the rights enumerated in paragraphs (a) 2269 (e), as follows: 2270 (a)âProtecting the individualâs right to cast a ballot and 2271 make the ballot valid. 2272 (b)âEnsuring eligible individuals seeking voter 2273 registration are not impaired in being registered. 2274 (c)âEnsuring voters are not impaired in voting, including, 2275 but not limited to, having their votes counted. 2276 (d)âMaking the fundamental right to vote more accessible to 2277 eligible voters. 2278 (e)âEnsuring equitable access for protected class members 2279 to opportunities to be registered to vote and to vote. 2280 (2)âIt is the policy of the state that courts should 2281 exercise their discretion on any issue, including, but not 2282 limited to, questions of discovery, procedure, admissibility of 2283 evidence, or remedies, in favor of the rights enumerated in 2284 paragraphs (1)(a)-(e) to the extent allowable by law. 2285 Furthermore, it is the policy of the state to promote the free 2286 flow of documents and information concerning the intent of 2287 public officials in actions concerning the right to vote. 2288 Accordingly, in any action under this act, the federal Voting 2289 Rights Act, or a voting-related claim under the State 2290 Constitution or the United States Constitution, sovereign, 2291 governmental, executive, legislative, or deliberative immunities 2292 and privileges, including any evidentiary privileges, may not be 2293 asserted. However, this section does not apply to any attorney 2294 client or attorney work-product privileges. 2295 Section 17.âSection 97.28, Florida Statutes, is created to 2296 read: 2297 97.28âRemedies.â 2298 (1)âIf a court finds a violation of this act, the court 2299 must order appropriate remedies that are tailored to address 2300 such violation and to ensure protected class members have 2301 equitable opportunities to fully participate in the political 2302 process and that the remedies can be implemented in a manner 2303 that will not unduly disrupt the administration of an ongoing or 2304 imminent election. Appropriate remedies include, but need not be 2305 limited to, any of the following: 2306 (a)âAnother method of election or changes to the existing 2307 method of election. 2308 (b)âElimination of staggered elections so that all members 2309 of the legislative body are elected at the same time. 2310 (c)âReasonably increasing the size of the legislative body. 2311 (d)âAdditional voting days or hours. 2312 (e)âAdditional polling places and early voting sites. 2313 (f)âAdditional opportunities to return ballots. 2314 (g)âHolding special elections. 2315 (h)âExpanded opportunities for voter registration. 2316 (i)âAdditional voter education. 2317 (j)âThe restoration or addition of individuals to registry 2318 lists. 2319 (k)âRetaining jurisdiction for such a period of time as the 2320 court deems appropriate. 2321 (2)âThe court shall consider remedies proposed by any party 2322 to the action or by interested nonparties. The court may not 2323 give deference or priority to a proposed remedy because it is 2324 proposed by the state or local government. 2325 (3)âIf necessary to remedy a violation of this act, the 2326 court is empowered to require a local government to implement 2327 remedies that are inconsistent with any other law and any 2328 special act, charter or home rule ordinance, or other enactment 2329 of the state or local government. 2330 (4)âNotwithstanding the Florida Rules of Civil Procedure or 2331 any other law, the court must grant a temporary injunction and 2332 any other preliminary relief requested under this section with 2333 respect to an upcoming election if the court determines that the 2334 party is more likely than not to succeed on the merits and that 2335 it is possible to implement an appropriate temporary remedy that 2336 would resolve the violation alleged under this section before 2337 the next general election. 2338 (5)âIn any action to enforce this act, the court shall 2339 award reasonable attorney fees and litigation costs, including, 2340 but not limited to, expert witness fees and expenses, to the 2341 party that filed an action, other than a state or local 2342 government, and that prevailed in such action. The party that 2343 filed the action is deemed to have prevailed when, as a result 2344 of litigation, the party against whom the action was filed has 2345 yielded some or all of the relief sought in the action. In the 2346 case of a party against whom an action was filed and who 2347 prevailed, the court may not award the party any costs unless 2348 the court finds the action to be frivolous, unreasonable, or 2349 without foundation. 2350 Section 18.âParagraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 2351 98.045, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2352 98.045âAdministration of voter registration.â 2353 (4)âSTATEWIDE ELECTRONIC DATABASE OF VALID RESIDENTIAL 2354 STREET ADDRESSES.â 2355 (b)âThe department shall make the statewide database of 2356 valid street addresses available to the Department of Highway 2357 Safety and Motor Vehicles as provided in s. 97.057(8) s. 2358 97.057(10). The Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles 2359 shall use the database for purposes of validating the legal 2360 residential addresses provided in voter registration 2361 applications received by the Department of Highway Safety and 2362 Motor Vehicles. 2363 Section 19.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 98.255, 2364 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2365 98.255âVoter education programs.â 2366 (1)âThe Department of State shall adopt rules prescribing 2367 minimum standards for nonpartisan voter education. The standards 2368 shall, at a minimum, address: 2369 (a)âVoter registration; 2370 (b)âBalloting procedures, by mail and polling place; 2371 (c)âVoter rights and responsibilities; 2372 (d)âDistribution of sample ballots; and 2373 (e)âPublic service announcements; and 2374 (f)âPlain writing standards consistent with official 2375 federal guidelines for the Plain Writing Act of 2010 and United 2376 States Election Assistance Commission best practices for 2377 designing effective voter education materials. 2378 (2)âEach county supervisor shall implement the minimum 2379 voter education standards, and shall conduct additional 2380 nonpartisan education efforts as necessary to ensure that voters 2381 have a working knowledge of the voting process. This includes 2382 providing, to the extent possible, public-facing voter 2383 information in plain language reasonably calculated to be 2384 understood by persons with grade 8 reading level or lower. 2385 Section 20.âParagraphs (e) and (g) of subsection (14) of 2386 section 100.371, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2387 100.371âInitiatives; procedure for placement on ballot.â 2388 (14) 2389 (e)âBeginning October 1, 2025, when the signature on the 2390 petition form is verified as valid, the supervisor shall, as 2391 soon as practicable, notify the voter by mail at the mailing 2392 address on file in the Florida Voter Registration System. 2393 1.âSuch notice must be sent by forwardable mail with a 2394 postage prepaid preaddressed form, which may be returned to the 2395 office of the supervisor of elections Office of Election Crimes 2396 and Security. The notice must include contact information for 2397 the office of the supervisor of elections Office of Election 2398 Crimes and Security, including the telephone number, fax number, 2399 mailing address, and e-mail address. The notice must include all 2400 of the following statements or information in substantially the 2401 following form: 2402 2403 NOTICE 2404 2405 A petition to place a proposed constitutional 2406 amendment on the ballot for the next general election, 2407 bearing your name and signature, has been received and 2408 verified by the Supervisor of Elections Office in 2409 ...(insert county).... 2410 2411 The petition is for ...(insert the petition serial 2412 number and ballot title)... and was signed on 2413 ...(insert the date the voter signed the petition).... 2414 2415 Check this box â, sign, and return this notice to the 2416 Office of the Supervisor of Elections Office of 2417 Election Crimes and Security if you believe your 2418 signature has been misrepresented or forged on a 2419 petition. The petition form in question will be 2420 invalidated and will not be counted toward the number 2421 of signatures required to place this proposed 2422 constitutional amendment on the ballot. 2423 2424 A notice being returned must be received by the Office 2425 of the Supervisor of Elections Office of Election 2426 Crimes and Security on or before February 1 ...(insert 2427 the year in which the general election is held).... 2428 2429 ...(Insert the voterâs Florida voter registration 2430 number, and if applicable, the petition circulatorâs 2431 number).... 2432 2433 By signing below, I swear or affirm that my signature 2434 was misrepresented or forged on the petition form 2435 indicated in this notice. 2436 2437 ...(Voterâs Signature)... ...(Date)... 2438 2439 This notice becomes a public record upon receipt by 2440 the Office of the Supervisor of Elections Office of 2441 Election Crimes and Security. It is a second degree 2442 misdemeanor, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, 2443 Florida Statutes, or s. 772.083, Florida Statutes, for 2444 a person to knowingly make a false official statement 2445 pursuant to s. 837.06, Florida Statutes. 2446 2447 2.âUpon receiving a completed notice, the office of the 2448 supervisor of elections Office of Election Crimes and Security 2449 shall transmit a copy of such notices to the division. The 2450 division shall deem the voterâs petition form invalid. 2451 (g)âOn the last day of each month, or on the last day of 2452 each week from December 1 of an odd-numbered year through 2453 February 1 of the following year, each supervisor shall post on 2454 his or her website the total number of signatures submitted, the 2455 total number of invalid signatures, the total number of 2456 signatures processed, and the aggregate number of verified valid 2457 signatures and the distribution of such signatures by 2458 congressional district for each proposed amendment proposed by 2459 initiative, along with the following information specific to the 2460 reporting period: the total number of signed petition forms 2461 received, the total number of signatures verified, the 2462 distribution of verified valid signatures by congressional 2463 district, and the total number of verified petition forms 2464 forwarded to the Secretary of State. For any reporting period in 2465 which the percentage of petition forms deemed invalid by the 2466 supervisor exceeds a total of 25 percent of the petition forms 2467 received by the supervisor for that reporting period, the 2468 supervisor shall notify the department Office of Election Crimes 2469 and Security. The department Office of Election Crimes and 2470 Security shall conduct a preliminary investigation into the 2471 activities of the sponsor, one or more petition circulators, or 2472 a person collecting petition forms on behalf of a sponsor, to 2473 determine whether the invalidated petitions are a result of 2474 fraud or any other violation of this section. As authorized by 2475 s. 97.012(15) ss. 97.012(15) and 97.022(1), the secretary Office 2476 of Elections Crimes and Security may, if warranted, report 2477 findings to the statewide prosecutor or the state attorney for 2478 the judicial circuit in which the alleged violation occurred for 2479 prosecution. 2480 Section 21.âSection 100.51, Florida Statutes, is created to 2481 read: 2482 100.51âGeneral Election Day paid holiday.âIn order to 2483 encourage civic participation, enable more individuals to serve 2484 as poll workers, and provide additional time for the resolution 2485 of any issue that arises while a voter is casting his or her 2486 ballot, General Election Day shall be a paid holiday. A voter is 2487 entitled to absent himself or herself from any service or 2488 employment in which he or she is engaged or employed during the 2489 time the polls are open on General Election Day. A voter who 2490 absents himself or herself under this section may not be 2491 penalized in any way, and a deduction may not be made from his 2492 or her usual salary or wages, on account of his or her absence. 2493 Section 22.âSection 101.016, Florida Statutes, is created 2494 to read: 2495 101.016âStrategic elections equipment reserve.â 2496 (1)âThe Division of Elections shall maintain a secure 2497 election equipment reserve that may be deployed in the event of 2498 an emergency as defined in s. 101.732 or in the event of 2499 capacity issues due to unexpected voter turnout. 2500 (2)âThe reserve, at a minimum, must include ballot marking 2501 devices, scanners, tabulation equipment, ballot-on-demand 2502 printers, paper required for voting machines and printers, 2503 accessible voting equipment, electronic poll books, 2504 uninterrupted power supplies, generators, cabling, and power 2505 cords, and may include other related equipment necessary to 2506 ensure the continuity of elections, consistent with the voting 2507 systems certified for use by each supervisor of elections. 2508 (3)âThe division may, in lieu of maintaining a physical 2509 reserve of such equipment, contract with one or more certified 2510 vendors of voting systems to provide such equipment on an as 2511 needed basis. Any such contract must include all of the 2512 following: 2513 (a)âA guaranteed delivery timeframe no later than 24 hours 2514 after a request by a supervisor of election, the division, or 2515 the department. 2516 (b)âRequirements for the secure transportation, 2517 installation, and removal of equipment. 2518 (c)âMaintenance of secure custody and detailed chain-of 2519 custody records for all equipment consistent with s. 101.015 and 2520 related administrative rules, including documentation of each 2521 transfer, installation, removal, and compliance with applicable 2522 state cybersecurity and physical security standards. 2523 (4)âNo later than February 1, 2027, and annually no later 2524 than February 1 thereafter, the division shall submit a report 2525 to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of 2526 the House of Representatives which includes all of the 2527 following: 2528 (a)âThe current inventory of equipment held in reserve or 2529 available by vendor contract. 2530 (b)âA list of all deployments of equipment under this 2531 section during the preceding calendar year, including the reason 2532 for deployment, response time, and associated costs. 2533 (c)âRecommendations for improvements to ensure readiness 2534 for future elections. 2535 Section 23.âSection 101.019, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 2536 Section 24.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 101.048, 2537 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2538 101.048âProvisional ballots.â 2539 (1)âAt all elections, a voter claiming to be properly 2540 registered in this the state and eligible to vote at the 2541 precinct in the election but whose eligibility cannot be 2542 determined, a person whom an election official asserts is not 2543 eligible, including, but not limited to, a person to whom notice 2544 has been sent pursuant to s. 98.075(7), but for whom a final 2545 determination of eligibility has not been made, and other 2546 persons specified in the code is shall be entitled to vote a 2547 provisional ballot at any precinct in the county in which the 2548 voter claims to be registered. Once voted, the provisional 2549 ballot must be placed in a secrecy envelope and thereafter 2550 sealed in a provisional ballot envelope. The provisional ballot 2551 must be deposited in a ballot box. All provisional ballots must 2552 remain sealed in their envelopes for return to the supervisor of 2553 elections. The department shall prescribe the form of the 2554 provisional ballot envelope. A person casting a provisional 2555 ballot has the right to present written evidence supporting his 2556 or her eligibility to vote to the supervisor of elections by not 2557 later than 5 p.m. on the second day following the election. 2558 (2)(a)âThe county canvassing board shall examine each 2559 Provisional Ballot Voterâs Certificate and Affirmation to 2560 determine if the person voting that ballot was entitled to vote 2561 in the county in which at the precinct where the person cast a 2562 vote in the election and that the person had not otherwise 2563 already cast a ballot in the election. In determining whether a 2564 person casting a provisional ballot is entitled to vote, the 2565 county canvassing board shall review the information provided in 2566 the Voterâs Certificate and Affirmation, written evidence 2567 provided by the person pursuant to subsection (1), information 2568 provided in any cure affidavit and accompanying supporting 2569 documentation pursuant to subsection (6), any other evidence 2570 presented by the supervisor, and, in the case of a challenge, 2571 any evidence presented by the challenger. A ballot of a person 2572 casting a provisional ballot must shall be canvassed pursuant to 2573 paragraph (b) unless the canvassing board determines by a 2574 preponderance of the evidence that the person was not entitled 2575 to vote. 2576 (b)âIf it is determined that the person was registered and 2577 entitled to vote in the county in which at the precinct where 2578 the person cast a vote in the election, the canvassing board 2579 must compare the signature on the Provisional Ballot Voterâs 2580 Certificate and Affirmation or the provisional ballot cure 2581 affidavit with the signature on the voterâs registration or 2582 precinct register. A provisional ballot may be counted only if: 2583 1.âThe signature on the voterâs certificate or the cure 2584 affidavit matches the electorâs signature in the registration 2585 books or the precinct register; however, in the case of a cure 2586 affidavit, the supporting identification listed in subsection 2587 (6) must also confirm the identity of the elector; or 2588 2.âThe cure affidavit contains a signature that does not 2589 match the electorâs signature in the registration books or the 2590 precinct register, but the elector has submitted a current and 2591 valid Tier 1 form of identification confirming his or her 2592 identity pursuant to subsection (6). 2593 2594 For purposes of this paragraph, any canvassing board finding 2595 that signatures do not match must be by majority vote and beyond 2596 a reasonable doubt. 2597 (c)âAny provisional ballot not counted must remain in the 2598 envelope containing the Provisional Ballot Voterâs Certificate 2599 and Affirmation, and the envelope must shall be marked âRejected 2600 as Illegal.â 2601 (d)âIf a provisional ballot is validated following the 2602 submission of a cure affidavit, the supervisor must make a copy 2603 of the affidavit, affix it to a voter registration application, 2604 and immediately process it as a valid request for a signature 2605 update pursuant to s. 98.077. 2606 Section 25.âSubsection (1) of section 101.572, Florida 2607 Statutes, is amended to read: 2608 101.572âPublic inspection of ballots.â 2609 (1)âThe official ballots and ballot cards received from 2610 election boards and removed from vote-by-mail ballot mailing 2611 envelopes and voter certificates on such mailing envelopes shall 2612 be open for public inspection or examination while in the 2613 custody of the supervisor of elections or the county canvassing 2614 board at any reasonable time, under reasonable conditions; 2615 however, no persons other than the supervisor of elections or 2616 his or her employees or the county canvassing board shall handle 2617 any official ballot or ballot card. If the ballots are being 2618 examined prior to the end of the contest period in s. 102.168, 2619 the supervisor of elections shall make a reasonable effort to 2620 notify all candidates whose names appear on such ballots or 2621 ballot cards by telephone or otherwise of the time and place of 2622 the inspection or examination. All such candidates, or their 2623 representatives, shall be allowed to be present during the 2624 inspection or examination. 2625 Section 26.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) and paragraphs 2626 (c) and (d) of subsection (3) of section 101.62, Florida 2627 Statutes, are amended, and subsection (7) is added to that 2628 section, to read: 2629 101.62âRequest for vote-by-mail ballots.â 2630 (1)âREQUEST.â 2631 (a)âThe supervisor shall accept a request for a vote-by 2632 mail ballot only from a voter or, if directly instructed by the 2633 voter, a member of the voterâs immediate family or the voterâs 2634 legal guardian. A request may be made in person, in writing, by 2635 telephone, or through the supervisorâs website. The department 2636 shall prescribe by rule by October 1, 2023, a uniform statewide 2637 application to make a written request for a vote-by-mail ballot 2638 which includes fields for all information required in this 2639 subsection. One request is deemed sufficient to receive a vote 2640 by-mail ballot for all elections until the voter or the voterâs 2641 designee notifies the supervisor that the voter cancels such 2642 request through the end of the calendar year of the next 2643 regularly scheduled general election, unless the voter or the 2644 voterâs designee indicates at the time the request is made the 2645 elections within such period for which the voter desires to 2646 receive a vote-by-mail ballot. The supervisor must cancel a 2647 request for a vote-by-mail ballot when any first-class mail or 2648 nonforwardable mail sent by the supervisor to the voter is 2649 returned as undeliverable. If the voter requests a vote-by-mail 2650 ballot thereafter, the voter must provide or confirm his or her 2651 current residential address. 2652 (3)âDELIVERY OF VOTE-BY-MAIL BALLOTS.â 2653 (c)âExcept as otherwise provided in paragraph (a) or 2654 paragraph (b), the supervisor shall mail vote-by-mail ballots 2655 within 2 business days after receiving a request for such a 2656 ballot, but no later than the 11th 10th day before election day. 2657 The deadline to submit a request for a ballot to be mailed is 5 2658 p.m. local time on the 12th day before an upcoming election. 2659 (d)âUpon a request for a vote-by-mail ballot, the 2660 supervisor shall provide a vote-by-mail ballot to each voter by 2661 whom a request for that ballot has been made, by one of the 2662 following means: 2663 1.âBy nonforwardable, return-if-undeliverable mail to the 2664 voterâs current mailing address on file with the supervisor or 2665 any other address the voter specifies in the request. The 2666 envelopes must be prominently marked âDo Not Forward.â 2667 2.âBy forwardable mail, e-mail, or facsimile machine 2668 transmission to absent uniformed services voters and overseas 2669 voters. The absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter 2670 may designate in the vote-by-mail ballot request the preferred 2671 method of transmission. If the voter does not designate the 2672 method of transmission, the vote-by-mail ballot must be mailed. 2673 3.âBy personal delivery to the voter after vote-by-mail 2674 ballots have been mailed and up to 7 p.m. on election day upon 2675 presentation of the identification required in s. 101.043. 2676 4.âBy delivery to the voterâs designee after vote-by-mail 2677 ballots have been mailed and up to 7 p.m. on election day. Any 2678 voter may designate in writing a person to pick up the ballot 2679 for the voter; however, the person designated may not pick up 2680 more than two vote-by-mail ballots per election, other than the 2681 designeeâs own ballot, except that additional ballots may be 2682 picked up for members of the designeeâs immediate family. The 2683 designee shall provide to the supervisor the written 2684 authorization by the voter and a picture identification of the 2685 designee and must complete an affidavit. The designee shall 2686 state in the affidavit that the designee is authorized by the 2687 voter to pick up that ballot and shall indicate if the voter is 2688 a member of the designeeâs immediate family and, if so, the 2689 relationship. The department shall prescribe the form of the 2690 affidavit. If the supervisor is satisfied that the designee is 2691 authorized to pick up the ballot and that the signature of the 2692 voter on the written authorization matches the signature of the 2693 voter on file, the supervisor must give the ballot to that 2694 designee for delivery to the voter. 2695 5.âExcept as provided in s. 101.655, the supervisor may not 2696 deliver a vote-by-mail ballot to a voter or a voterâs designee 2697 pursuant to subparagraph 3. or subparagraph 4., respectively, 2698 during the mandatory early voting period and up to 7 p.m. on 2699 election day, unless there is an emergency, to the extent that 2700 the voter will be unable to go to a designated early voting site 2701 in his or her county or to his or her assigned polling place on 2702 election day. If a vote-by-mail ballot is delivered, the voter 2703 or his or her designee must execute an affidavit affirming to 2704 the facts which allow for delivery of the vote-by-mail ballot. 2705 The department shall adopt a rule providing for the form of the 2706 affidavit. 2707 (7)âDEADLINE EXTENSION.âIf a deadline under this section 2708 falls on a day when the office of the supervisor is scheduled to 2709 be closed, the deadline must be extended until the next business 2710 day. 2711 Section 27.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) and subsections 2712 (2) and (4) of section 101.64, Florida Statutes, are amended to 2713 read: 2714 101.64âDelivery of vote-by-mail ballots; envelopes; form.â 2715 (1)(a)âThe supervisor shall enclose with each vote-by-mail 2716 ballot two envelopes: a secrecy envelope, into which the absent 2717 voter must elector shall enclose his or her marked ballot; and a 2718 postage prepaid mailing envelope, into which the absent voter 2719 must elector shall then place the secrecy envelope, which must 2720 shall be addressed to the supervisor and also bear on the back 2721 side a certificate in substantially the following form: 2722 2723 Note: Please Read Instructions Carefully Before 2724 Marking Ballot and Completing Voterâs Certificate. 2725 VOTERâS CERTIFICATE 2726 I, ...., do solemnly swear or affirm that I am a qualified 2727 and registered voter of .... County, Florida, and that I have 2728 not and will not vote more than one ballot in this election. I 2729 understand that if I commit or attempt to commit any fraud in 2730 connection with voting, vote a fraudulent ballot, or vote more 2731 than once in an election, I can be convicted of a felony of the 2732 third degree and fined up to $5,000 and/or imprisoned for up to 2733 5 years. I also understand that failure to sign this certificate 2734 will invalidate my ballot. 2735 ...(Date)... 2736 ...(Voterâs Signature or Last Four Digits of Social Security 2737 Number)... 2738 ...(E-Mail Address)...	...(Home Telephone Number)... 2739 ...(Mobile Telephone Number)... 2740 2741 (2)âThe certificate must shall be arranged on the back of 2742 the mailing envelope so that the line for the signature or last 2743 four digits of the social security number of the voter are 2744 absent elector is across the seal of the envelope; however, a no 2745 statement may not shall appear on the envelope which indicates 2746 that a signature or the last four digits of the social security 2747 number of the voter must cross the seal of the envelope. The 2748 voter must absent elector shall execute the certificate on the 2749 envelope. 2750 (4)âThe supervisor shall mark, code, indicate on, or 2751 otherwise track the precinct of the voter absent elector for 2752 each vote-by-mail ballot. 2753 Section 28.âSection 101.65, Florida Statutes, is amended to 2754 read: 2755 101.65âInstructions to absent electors.âThe supervisor 2756 shall enclose with each vote-by-mail ballot separate printed 2757 instructions in substantially the following form; however, where 2758 the instructions appear in capitalized text, the text of the 2759 printed instructions must be in bold font: 2760 2761 READ THESE INSTRUCTIONS CAREFULLY 2762 BEFORE MARKING BALLOT. 2763 2764 1.âVERY IMPORTANT. In order to ensure that your vote-by 2765 mail ballot will be counted, it should be completed and returned 2766 as soon as possible so that it can reach the supervisor of 2767 elections of the county in which your precinct is located no 2768 later than 7 p.m. on the day of the election. However, if you 2769 are an overseas voter casting a ballot in a presidential 2770 preference primary or general election, your vote-by-mail ballot 2771 must be postmarked or dated no later than the date of the 2772 election and received by the supervisor of elections of the 2773 county in which you are registered to vote no later than 10 days 2774 after the date of the election. Note that the later you return 2775 your ballot, the less time you will have to cure any signature 2776 deficiencies, which may cause your ballot not to be counted is 2777 authorized until 5 p.m. on the 2nd day after the election. If 2778 there is a problem with your signature, the supervisor of 2779 elections must notify you as soon as practicable, and you have 2780 until 5 p.m. on the second day after the election to correct it. 2781 2.âMark your ballot in secret as instructed on the ballot. 2782 You must mark your own ballot unless you are unable to do so 2783 because of blindness, disability, or inability to read or write. 2784 3.âMark only the number of candidates or issue choices for 2785 a race as indicated on the ballot. If you are allowed to âVote 2786 for Oneâ candidate and you vote for more than one candidate, 2787 your vote in that race will not be counted. 2788 4.âPlace your marked ballot in the enclosed secrecy 2789 envelope. 2790 5.âInsert the secrecy envelope into the enclosed mailing 2791 envelope which is addressed to the supervisor. 2792 6.âSeal the mailing envelope and completely fill out the 2793 Voterâs Certificate on the back of the mailing envelope. 2794 7.âVERY IMPORTANT. In order for your vote-by-mail ballot to 2795 be counted, you must sign your name or print the last four 2796 digits of your social security number on the line above (Voterâs 2797 Signature or Last Four Digits of Social Security Number). A 2798 vote-by-mail ballot will be considered illegal and not be 2799 counted if the signature or the last four digits of the social 2800 security number on the voterâs certificate do does not match the 2801 signature or social security number on record. The signature on 2802 file at the time the supervisor of elections in the county in 2803 which your precinct is located receives your vote-by-mail ballot 2804 is the signature that will be used to verify your signature on 2805 the voterâs certificate. If you need to update your signature 2806 for this election, send your signature update on a voter 2807 registration application to your supervisor of elections so that 2808 it is received before your vote-by-mail ballot is received. 2809 8.âVERY IMPORTANT. If you are an overseas voter, you must 2810 include the date you signed the Voterâs Certificate or printed 2811 the last four digits of your social security number on the line 2812 above (Date) or your ballot may not be counted. 2813 9.âMail, deliver, or have delivered the completed mailing 2814 envelope. If mailing, be sure there is sufficient postage if the 2815 mailing envelope is not already postage-paid mailed. THE 2816 COMPLETED MAILING ENVELOPE CAN BE DELIVERED TO THE OFFICE OF THE 2817 SUPERVISOR OF ELECTIONS OF THE COUNTY IN WHICH YOUR PRECINCT IS 2818 LOCATED OR DROPPED OFF AT AN AUTHORIZED SECURE BALLOT INTAKE 2819 STATION, AVAILABLE AT EACH EARLY VOTING LOCATION. 2820 10.âFELONY NOTICE. It is a felony under Florida law to 2821 accept any gift, payment, or gratuity in exchange for your vote 2822 for a candidate. It is also a felony under Florida law to vote 2823 in an election using a false identity or false address, or under 2824 any other circumstances making your ballot false or fraudulent. 2825 Section 29.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1), 2826 paragraph (c) of subsection (2), and paragraphs (a), (c), and 2827 (d) of subsection (4) of section 101.68, Florida Statutes, are 2828 amended to read: 2829 101.68âCanvassing of vote-by-mail ballot.â 2830 (1)(a)âThe supervisor of the county where the absent 2831 elector resides shall receive the voted ballot, at which time 2832 the supervisor shall compare the signature or the last four 2833 digits of the social security number of the elector on the 2834 voterâs certificate with the signature or the last four digits 2835 of the social security number of the elector in the registration 2836 books or the precinct register to determine whether the elector 2837 is duly registered in the county and must record on the 2838 electorâs registration record that the elector has voted. During 2839 the signature comparison process, the supervisor may not use any 2840 knowledge of the political affiliation of the elector whose 2841 signature is subject to verification. 2842 (b)âAn elector who dies after casting a vote-by-mail ballot 2843 but on or before election day must shall remain listed in the 2844 registration books until the results have been certified for the 2845 election in which the ballot was cast. The supervisor shall 2846 safely keep the ballot unopened in his or her office until the 2847 county canvassing board canvasses the vote pursuant to 2848 subsection (2). 2849 (2) 2850 (c)1.âThe canvassing board must, if the supervisor has not 2851 already done so, compare the signature or the last four digits 2852 of the social security number of the elector on the voterâs 2853 certificate or on the vote-by-mail ballot cure affidavit as 2854 provided in subsection (4) with the signature or last four 2855 digits of the social security number of the elector in the 2856 registration books or the precinct register to see that the 2857 elector is duly registered in the county and to determine the 2858 validity legality of that vote-by-mail ballot. A vote-by-mail 2859 ballot may only be counted if: 2860 a.âThe signature or last four digits of the social security 2861 number on the voterâs certificate or the cure affidavit match 2862 matches the electorâs signature or last four digits of the 2863 social security number in the registration books or precinct 2864 register; however, in the case of a cure affidavit, the 2865 supporting identification listed in subsection (4) must also 2866 confirm the identity of the elector; or 2867 b.âThe cure affidavit contains a signature or the last four 2868 digits of a social security number which do that does not match 2869 the electorâs signature or last four digits of the social 2870 security number in the registration books or precinct register, 2871 but the elector has submitted a current and valid Tier 1 2872 identification pursuant to subsection (4) which confirms the 2873 identity of the elector. 2874 2875 For purposes of this subparagraph, any canvassing board finding 2876 that an electorâs signatures or last four digits of the 2877 electorâs social security number do not match must be by 2878 majority vote and beyond a reasonable doubt. 2879 2.âThe ballot of an elector who casts a vote-by-mail ballot 2880 shall be counted even if the elector dies on or before election 2881 day, as long as, before the death of the voter, the ballot was 2882 postmarked by the United States Postal Service, date-stamped 2883 with a verifiable tracking number by a common carrier, or 2884 already in the possession of the supervisor. 2885 3.âA vote-by-mail ballot is not considered invalid illegal 2886 if the signature or last four digits of the social security 2887 number of the elector do does not cross the seal of the mailing 2888 envelope. 2889 4.âIf any elector or candidate present believes that a 2890 vote-by-mail ballot is illegal due to a defect apparent on the 2891 voterâs certificate or the cure affidavit, he or she may, at any 2892 time before the ballot is removed from the envelope, file with 2893 the canvassing board a protest against the canvass of that 2894 ballot, specifying the precinct, the voterâs certificate or the 2895 cure affidavit, and the reason he or she believes the ballot to 2896 be illegal. A challenge based upon a defect in the voterâs 2897 certificate or cure affidavit may not be accepted after the 2898 ballot has been removed from the mailing envelope. 2899 5.âIf the canvassing board determines that a ballot is 2900 invalid illegal, a member of the board must, without opening the 2901 envelope, mark across the face of the envelope: ârejected as 2902 invalid illegal.â The cure affidavit, if applicable, the 2903 envelope, and the ballot therein must shall be preserved in the 2904 manner that official ballots are preserved. 2905 (4)(a)âAs soon as practicable, the supervisor shall, on 2906 behalf of the county canvassing board, attempt to notify an 2907 elector who has returned a vote-by-mail ballot that does not 2908 include the electorâs signature or last four digits of the 2909 electorâs social security number or contains a signature or the 2910 last four digits of a social security number that do does not 2911 match the electorâs signature or last four digits of the 2912 electorâs social security number in the registration books or 2913 precinct register by: 2914 1.âNotifying the elector of the signature or last four 2915 digits of the social security number deficiency by e-mail and 2916 directing the elector to the cure affidavit and instructions on 2917 the supervisorâs website; 2918 2.âNotifying the elector of the signature or last four 2919 digits of the social security number deficiency by text message 2920 and directing the elector to the cure affidavit and instructions 2921 on the supervisorâs website; or 2922 3.âNotifying the elector of the signature or last four 2923 digits of the social security number deficiency by telephone and 2924 directing the elector to the cure affidavit and instructions on 2925 the supervisorâs website. 2926 2927 In addition to the notification required under subparagraph 1., 2928 subparagraph 2., or subparagraph 3., the supervisor must notify 2929 the elector of the signature or last four digits of the social 2930 security number deficiency by first-class mail and direct the 2931 elector to the cure affidavit and instructions on the 2932 supervisorâs website. Beginning the day before the election, the 2933 supervisor is not required to provide notice of the signature 2934 deficiency by first-class mail, but shall continue to provide 2935 notice as required under subparagraph 1., subparagraph 2., or 2936 subparagraph 3. 2937 (c)âThe elector must complete a cure affidavit in 2938 substantially the following form: 2939 2940 VOTE-BY-MAIL BALLOT CURE AFFIDAVIT 2941 2942 I, ...., am a qualified voter in this election and 2943 registered voter of .... County, Florida. I do solemnly swear or 2944 affirm that I requested and returned the vote-by-mail ballot and 2945 that I have not and will not vote more than one ballot in this 2946 election. I understand that if I commit or attempt any fraud in 2947 connection with voting, vote a fraudulent ballot, or vote more 2948 than once in an election, I may be convicted of a felony of the 2949 third degree and fined up to $5,000 and imprisoned for up to 5 2950 years. I understand that my failure to sign this affidavit means 2951 that my vote-by-mail ballot will be invalidated. 2952 2953 ...(Voterâs Signature or Last Four Digits of Social Security 2954 Number)... 2955 ...(Address)... 2956 2957 (d)âInstructions must accompany the cure affidavit in 2958 substantially the following form: 2959 2960 READ THESE INSTRUCTIONS CAREFULLY BEFORE COMPLETING THE 2961 AFFIDAVIT. FAILURE TO FOLLOW THESE INSTRUCTIONS MAY CAUSE YOUR 2962 BALLOT NOT TO COUNT. 2963 2964 1.âIn order to ensure that your vote-by-mail ballot will be 2965 counted, your affidavit should be completed and returned as soon 2966 as possible so that it can reach the supervisor of elections of 2967 the county in which your precinct is located no later than 5 2968 p.m. on the 2nd day after the election. 2969 2.âYou must sign your name or print the last four digits of 2970 your social security number on the line above (Voterâs Signature 2971 or Last Four Digits of Social Security Number). 2972 3.âYou must make a copy of one of the following forms of 2973 identification: 2974 a.âTier 1 identification.âCurrent and valid identification 2975 that includes your name and photograph: Florida driver license; 2976 Florida identification card issued by the Department of Highway 2977 Safety and Motor Vehicles; United States passport; debit or 2978 credit card; military identification; student identification; 2979 retirement center identification; neighborhood association 2980 identification; public assistance identification; veteran health 2981 identification card issued by the United States Department of 2982 Veterans Affairs; a Florida license to carry a concealed weapon 2983 or firearm; or an employee identification card issued by any 2984 branch, department, agency, or entity of the Federal Government, 2985 the state, a county, or a municipality; or 2986 b.âTier 2 identification.âONLY IF YOU DO NOT HAVE A TIER 1 2987 FORM OF IDENTIFICATION, identification that shows your name and 2988 current residence address: current utility bill, bank statement, 2989 government check, paycheck, or government document (excluding 2990 voter information card). 2991 4.âPlace the envelope bearing the affidavit into a mailing 2992 envelope addressed to the supervisor. Insert a copy of your 2993 identification in the mailing envelope. Mail (if time permits), 2994 deliver, or have delivered the completed affidavit along with 2995 the copy of your identification to your county supervisor of 2996 elections. Be sure there is sufficient postage if mailed and 2997 that the supervisorâs address is correct. Remember, your 2998 information MUST reach your county supervisor of elections no 2999 later than 5 p.m. on the 2nd day after the election, or your 3000 ballot will not count. 3001 5.âAlternatively, you may hand deliver, fax, or e-mail your 3002 completed affidavit and a copy of your identification to the 3003 supervisor of elections. If e-mailing, please provide these 3004 documents as attachments. 3005 Section 30.âSection 101.69, Florida Statutes, is amended to 3006 read: 3007 101.69âVoting in person; return of vote-by-mail ballot.â 3008 (1)âThe provisions of this code may shall not be construed 3009 to prohibit any voter elector from voting in person at the 3010 voterâs electorâs precinct on the day of an election or at an 3011 early voting site, notwithstanding that the voter elector has 3012 requested a vote-by-mail ballot for that election. A voter An 3013 elector who has returned a voted vote-by-mail ballot to the 3014 supervisor, however, is deemed to have cast his or her ballot 3015 and is not entitled to vote another ballot or to have a 3016 provisional ballot counted by the county canvassing board. A 3017 voter An elector who has received a vote-by-mail ballot and has 3018 not returned the voted ballot to the supervisor, but desires to 3019 vote in person, shall return the ballot, whether voted or not, 3020 to the election board in the voterâs electorâs precinct or to an 3021 early voting site. The returned ballot must shall be marked 3022 âcanceledâ by the board and placed with other canceled ballots. 3023 However, if the voter elector does not return the ballot and the 3024 election official: 3025 (a)âConfirms that the supervisor has received the voterâs 3026 electorâs vote-by-mail ballot, the voter may elector shall not 3027 be allowed to vote in person. If the voter elector maintains 3028 that he or she has not returned the vote-by-mail ballot or 3029 remains eligible to vote, the voter must elector shall be 3030 provided a provisional ballot as provided in s. 101.048. 3031 (b)âConfirms that the supervisor has not received the 3032 voterâs electorâs vote-by-mail ballot, the voter must elector 3033 shall be allowed to vote in person as provided in this code. The 3034 voterâs electorâs vote-by-mail ballot, if subsequently received, 3035 may shall not be counted and must shall remain in the mailing 3036 envelope, and the envelope must shall be marked âRejected as 3037 Illegal.â 3038 (c)âCannot determine whether the supervisor has received 3039 the voterâs electorâs vote-by-mail ballot, the voter elector may 3040 vote a provisional ballot as provided in s. 101.048. 3041 (2)(a)âThe supervisor shall allow a voter an elector who 3042 has received a vote-by-mail ballot to physically return a voted 3043 vote-by-mail ballot to the supervisor by placing the return mail 3044 envelope containing his or her marked ballot in a secure ballot 3045 intake station. Secure ballot intake stations must shall be 3046 placed at the main office of the supervisor, at each permanent 3047 branch office of the supervisor which meets the criteria set 3048 forth in s. 101.657(1)(a) for branch offices used for early 3049 voting and which is open for at least the minimum number of 3050 hours prescribed by s. 98.015(4), and at each early voting site. 3051 Secure ballot intake stations may also be placed at any other 3052 site that would otherwise qualify as an early voting site under 3053 s. 101.657(1). Secure ballot intake stations must be 3054 geographically located so as to provide all voters in the county 3055 with an equal opportunity to cast a ballot, insofar as is 3056 practicable. Except for secure ballot intake stations at an 3057 office of the supervisor, a secure ballot intake station may 3058 only be used during the countyâs early voting hours of operation 3059 and must be monitored in person by an employee of the 3060 supervisorâs office. A secure ballot intake station at an office 3061 of the supervisor must be continuously monitored in person by an 3062 employee of the supervisorâs office when the secure ballot 3063 intake station is accessible for deposit of ballots. 3064 (b)âA supervisor shall designate each secure ballot intake 3065 station location at least 30 days before an election. The 3066 supervisor shall provide the address of each secure ballot 3067 intake station location to the division at least 30 days before 3068 an election. After a secure ballot intake station location has 3069 been designated, it may not be moved or changed except as 3070 approved by the division to correct a violation of this 3071 subsection. 3072 (c)1.âOn each day of early voting, all secure ballot intake 3073 stations must be emptied at the end of early voting hours and 3074 all ballots retrieved from the secure ballot intake stations 3075 must be returned to the supervisorâs office. 3076 2.âFor secure ballot intake stations located at an office 3077 of the supervisor, all ballots must be retrieved before the 3078 secure ballot intake station is no longer monitored by an 3079 employee of the supervisor. 3080 3.âEmployees of the supervisor must comply with procedures 3081 for the chain of custody of ballots as required by s. 3082 101.015(4). 3083 (3)âIf any secure ballot intake station is left accessible 3084 for ballot receipt other than as authorized by this section, the 3085 supervisor is subject to a civil penalty of $25,000. The 3086 division is authorized to enforce this provision. 3087 Section 31.âSection 104.0616, Florida Statutes, is 3088 repealed. 3089 Section 32.âSubsection (1) of section 104.155, Florida 3090 Statutes, is amended to read: 3091 104.155âUnqualified noncitizen electors willfully voting; 3092 prohibited defenses; aiding or soliciting noncitizen electors in 3093 voting prohibited.â 3094 (1)âAny person who is not a qualified elector because he or 3095 she is not a citizen of the United States and who willfully 3096 votes in any election is guilty of a felony of the third degree, 3097 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 3098 A personâs ignorance of his or her citizenship status or a 3099 personâs bona fide belief of his or her citizenship status 3100 cannot be raised as a defense in a prosecution for a violation 3101 of this subsection. 3102 Section 33.âSubsection (1) of section 104.42, Florida 3103 Statutes, is amended to read: 3104 104.42âFraudulent registration and illegal voting; 3105 investigation.â 3106 (1)âThe supervisor of elections is authorized to 3107 investigate fraudulent registrations and illegal voting and to 3108 report his or her findings to the local state attorney and the 3109 Office of Election Crimes and Security. 3110 Section 34.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 3111 921.0022, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3112 921.0022âCriminal Punishment Code; offense severity ranking 3113 chart.â 3114 (3)âOFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART 3115 (a)âLEVEL 1 3116 3117 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 3118 24.118(3)(a) 3rd Counterfeit or altered state lottery ticket. 3119 104.0616(2) 3rd Unlawfully distributing, ordering, requesting, collecting, delivering, or possessing vote-by-mail ballots. 3120 212.054(2)(b) 3rd Discretionary sales surtax; limitations, administration, and collection. 3121 212.15(2)(b) 3rd Failure to remit sales taxes, amount $1,000 or more but less than $20,000. 3122 316.1935(1) 3rd Fleeing or attempting to elude law enforcement officer. 3123 319.30(5) 3rd Sell, exchange, give away certificate of title or identification number plate. 3124 319.35(1)(a) 3rd Tamper, adjust, change, etc., an odometer. 3125 320.26(1)(a) 3rd Counterfeit, manufacture, or sell registration license plates or validation stickers. 3126 322.212â(1)(a)-(c) 3rd Possession of forged, stolen, counterfeit, or unlawfully issued driver license; possession of simulated identification. 3127 322.212(4) 3rd Supply or aid in supplying unauthorized driver license or identification card. 3128 322.212(5)(a) 3rd False application for driver license or identification card. 3129 414.39(3)(a) 3rd Fraudulent misappropriation of public assistance funds by employee/official, value more than $200. 3130 443.071(1) 3rd False statement or representation to obtain or increase reemployment assistance benefits. 3131 509.151(1) 3rd Defraud an innkeeper, food or lodging value $1,000 or more. 3132 517.302(1) 3rd Violation of the Florida Securities and Investor Protection Act. 3133 713.69 3rd Tenant removes property upon which lien has accrued, value $1,000 or more. 3134 812.014(3)(c) 3rd Petit theft (3rd conviction); theft of any property not specified in subsection (2). 3135 815.04(4)(a) 3rd Offense against intellectual property (i.e., computer programs, data). 3136 817.52(2) 3rd Hiring with intent to defraud, motor vehicle services. 3137 817.569(2) 3rd Use of public record or public records information or providing false information to facilitate commission of a felony. 3138 826.01 3rd Bigamy. 3139 828.122(3) 3rd Fighting or baiting animals. 3140 831.04(1) 3rd Any erasure, alteration, etc., of any replacement deed, map, plat, or other document listed in s. 92.28. 3141 831.31(1)(a) 3rd Sell, deliver, or possess counterfeit controlled substances, all but s. 893.03(5) drugs. 3142 832.041(1) 3rd Stopping payment with intent to defraud $150 or more. 3143 832.05(2)(b) &â(4)(c) 3rd Knowing, making, issuing worthless checks $150 or more or obtaining property in return for worthless check $150 or more. 3144 838.15(2) 3rd Commercial bribe receiving. 3145 838.16 3rd Commercial bribery. 3146 843.18 3rd Fleeing by boat to elude a law enforcement officer. 3147 847.011(1)(a) 3rd Sell, distribute, etc., obscene, lewd, etc., material (2nd conviction). 3148 849.09(1)(a)-(d) 3rd Lottery; set up, promote, etc., or assist therein, conduct or advertise drawing for prizes, or dispose of property or money by means of lottery. 3149 849.23 3rd Gambling-related machines; âcommon offenderâ as to property rights. 3150 849.25(2) 3rd Engaging in bookmaking. 3151 860.08 3rd Interfere with a railroad signal. 3152 860.13(1)(a) 3rd Operate aircraft while under the influence. 3153 893.13(2)(a)2. 3rd Purchase of cannabis. 3154 893.13(6)(a) 3rd Possession of cannabis (more than 20 grams). 3155 934.03(1)(a) 3rd Intercepts, or procures any other person to intercept, any wire or oral communication. 3156 Section 35.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 3157 act and except for this section, which shall take effect upon 3158 this act becoming a law, this act shall take effect July 1, 3159 2026.